Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Number of Reviews
42

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
"Off to the movies we shall go...Where we learn everything
that we know...'Cause the movies teach us what our parents don't have
time to say." That's the "Mountain Song," which begins this rude,
raunchy, animated musical, starring Comedy Central's most corrupted TV
third-graders. The cheeky tykes - Cartman, Stan, Kyle and Kenny -
bribe a homeless man to take them to an R-rated movie, "Asses of
Fire," starring a foul-mouthed, flatulent Canadian duo. Armed with a
scatological vocabulary, which they don't truly comprehend, the boys
start spewing such profanity that their once-peaceful South Park
community launches a vindictive anti-smut campaign which grows into a
national movement, resulting in the United States declaring war on
Canada.  In one of the most cynical vignettes, one of the boys has a
behavior-modification V-chip implanted, delivering a severe electrical
shock each time he utters a bad word. How is the movie different from
the TV series? It's a musical with nasty, dirty parodies of "The Sound
of Music" and "Les Miserables" with some inspirational ballads tossed
in. Writer/director Trey Parker, along with Matt Stone, Pam Brady, and
composer Marc Shaiman have devised a cleverly scathing, if crude,
social parable, mocking our fear of and distaste for toilet humor,
Satan, and Saddam Hussein, plus making some biting points about
censorship, tolerance, and freedom of speech. Celebrity voices include
George Clooney, Minnie Driver, Brent Spiner, and Eric Idle. On the
Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "South Park" is an obscene, offensive,
smutty 7. Warning to parents: this funny, fast-paced, irreverent film
pushes the envelope of its R-rating and, while childish, is definitely
for adults, not children.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Do you remember back in grade school when one of the kids on the
playground would say some mildly off-color phrase, and you and your
buddies would erupt into nervous giggles?
Well, writers Trey Parker and Matt Stone do, and, in the animated film
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT, they move their foul-mouthed grade
school kids from their television series to the big screen, where they
get to lose their few remaining inhibitions.
Imagine visiting a grade school in which the kids compete for the
maximum number of obscenities per minute.  One in which the insults know
no bounds.  Mothers are universally referred to with the B-word, and
teachers are cussed out to the delight of the entire class.  There are
undoubtedly people who find this brand of humor extremely funny rather
than merely crude.  My audience was a mixture of laughers and starers.
The story concerns four boys who see an R-rated animated movie, ASSES OF
FIRE.  After watching the movie, one kid joins the Klan, but most just
switch to a new profanity-laced dialect of the English language.  "The
animation is all crappy," one of the boys complains in a bit of
self-deprecating humor.  Any first year art student could draw the
characters in SOUTH PARK.  The pictures have such little life that they
are effectively a series of slightly moving tableaux.
Some bits of humor start off well enough before they go off the deep
end.  One kid is killed when the doctors implant a baked potato instead
of a heart in his chest.  When he goes to heaven, it turns out to be
populated by naked Playboy models.  But the kid doesn't obtain
admission.  Punching the entry button to the Pearly Gates produces an
"Access Denied" error message.
This scene goes down hill once the youngster gets to hell, which is
populated by likely and unlikely figures (Hitler as well as Gandhi).
Saddam Hussein is there having gay sex with the devil.
Some of the political humor is quite funny, the best being a V-chip that
is implanted into one kid's skull.  Every bad word produces a painful
jolt.  And what do you say when you experience sudden pain?  You cuss,
of course, which only prolongs the agony.
Speaking of prolonging things, the movie would have worked much better
as a short film.  A quarter of an hour would have been plenty of time
with these tart-tongued tiny tots.
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT runs 1:20.  It is rated R for
pervasive vulgar language and crude sexual humor and for some violent
images.  It would be fine for teenagers.  Do not make the mistake of
taking kids under 13.  A woman in my audience did, and you could see her
grimacing.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Christopher Null
     I'll say it up front: This is not your classic four-star review.
`South Park' is definitely an acquired taste, but it's one I've picked
up, despite the series' lackluster performance over this season.
     SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER, AND UNCUT certainly makes up for it,
taking the comic adventures of four boys in the `redneck town' of South
Park, Colorado to new highs, er, lows, in their feature debut.
     And what a debut it is.  George Carlin?  Step aside.  Andrew `Dice'
Clay?  Old news.  Farrelly brothers?  Puh-leeze.  Lenny Bruce?  Meet
your replacement.  Shocking, in-your-face, blatantly offensive,
jaw-dropping, mind-boggling, floor-rolling, horribly crass humor has a
new master, and SOUTH PARK is it.
     Plot?  Firmly tongue in cheek, the boys of South Park want to see
an R-rated `Terrance and Philip' movie, but their parents won't let
them.  They sneak in, whereupon they pick up the nastiest foul mouths
this side of the Bangkok red light district.  When their parents
discover the source of the crudeness, Kyle's mom launches a crusade
against the crass cartoon, which culminates in Terrance and Philip's
incarceration and a war between America and Canada (T&P's homeland).
Meanwhile, appearances by everyone from Big Gay Al to Saddam Hussein to
a George Clooney-voiced doctor to Brian Boitano (well, in reference,
anyway) pay off the true fans.
     The subtext: The boys are on the side of freedom of speech, while
the parents don't seem to mind the violence that justifies solving the
problem...  Who woulda thought SOUTH PARK would have a theme!?  And a
good one, however blatant.
     I'm not going to try and justify SOUTH PARK's four stars on any
kind of artistic merit.  But I will say I haven't laughed this hard in a
couple of years, and some of the musical numbers will be impossible to
forget.
     While Mr. Hanky does not appear, much to my disappointment, SOUTH
PARK is such a wild ride that it really can't be missed, especially if,
like me, you have very bad taste.
Director: Trey Parker
Producer: Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Writer: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Pam Brady
Starring: Mary Kay Bergman, George Clooney, Minnie Driver, Isaac Hayes,
Eric Idle, Mike Judge, Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
John Sylva
South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut by DeWyNGaLe    Rating: A-
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe/MoviePED.html
*Note- This review contains some mildly vulgar language which could be
offensive to some, but the film calls for me to bring up these issues.
VOICES
Trey Parker- Eric Cartman, Stan Marsh, Mr. Harrison, Mr. Hat
Matt Stone- Kyle Brofloski, Kenny McCormick, Jimbo Marsh
Mary Kay Bergman- Sheila Brofloski, Mrs. Cartman, Mrs. McCormick, Wendy
Testaburger
Issac Hayes- Chef
Based on the hit television show, South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut is an
unbelievably vulgar animated comedy starring none other than America's favorite
lovable little 3rd grade South Park festively plump resident, Eric Cartman. 
Cartman, Kyle Brofloski, Kenny McCormick, and Stan Marsh are all here in this
film which seems to be a regular South Park episode, only three times the
length.  Being a devoted fan of South Park, the stretched out episode is good
news to me, and even those unfamiliar with South Park should find themselves
laughing during this potty mouthed film.
In South Park, Colorado, the new film, "Asses of Fire" is playing, which stars
two Canadian comedians who chowed down to much sour kraut dinner, Terrence and
Phillip.  After hundreds of children are exposed to the "R" rated language in
the film, new words can be heard flowing from the mouths of kids everywhere. 
In protest, Kyle Broslofski's Mom forms an organization against Terrence and
Phillip, resulting in the death sentence of the two, and the United States
declaring war on Canada. Meanwhile in Hell, Satan and new boyfriend Saddam
Hussein are outraged about the death sentence of Terrence and Phillip, and plan
to launch the apocalypse.
The result of one of the strangest plots in a film for years is an outrageous,
mind-blowing film.  Bigger, Longer, Uncut, which is directed by Trey Parker,
and written by Parker and Matt Stone, doesn't hold back on language, but uses
unrepeatable phrases, making me question how this film got an "R" rating from
the MPAA.  The film received an NC-17 rating from the MPAA three times, but
this final version doesn't seem to be edited at all, but rather "uncut." 
Bigger, Longer, and Uncut has language to offend everyone, whether it be
African Americans or smart students, this film has it all.  Some may take the
humor (which I believe is innocent) harshly, but as an African American in the
theater laughed as the blacks in the army are used as "Operation Human Shield"
against Canada, some may take it lightly and laugh at the classic use of humor.
If Bigger, Longer, and Uncut is going to offend one group in particular, it is
those who are very religious.  Themes of Satan being friendly and gay are shown
constantly, there is a child who hates God, and says unbelievably crude things
about him, among other lines and sequences which will have religious folks
scattering the theater before the relatively short film is finished.
Adding to the humor are the songs in which characters break out into
frequently, which have more appeal to me than the songs in Disney's recent
release, Tarzan.  Although every song is particularly vulgar, the tunes are
catchy and upbeat, and surprisingly well done.
South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut couldn't come at a better time, as the
MPAA is cracking down on teens seeing "R" rated films, this film proudly waves
the middle finger at the association.  I agree with a character in the film
that says something along the lines of, "You can have loads of violence in a
film, but bad language isn't okay."  Bigger, Longer, and Uncut is a "theme
movie" of sorts for those who dislike the MPAA as much as the film's writers
do, Matt Stone and Trey Parker.
Some may say "Anyone could make a film about four foul mouthed kids with
terrible animation," but I disagree with that.  For someone to take this simple
concept, create a national phenomenon, and make me laugh to the point where I
was choking on my popcorn, is sheer brilliance.  What is the brilliant force
behind South Park?  You may say I'm crazy, but Trey Parker and Matt Stone are
brilliant.
The Bottom Line- A film that delivers the fans of South Park what they need--
an "Uncut" version of the hilarious T.V. show.

Author
Jesse Kopelman
South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut
This movie is based on the television show _South Park_ and some knowledge
of the show would enhance one's viewing enjoyment of the movie. Rarely have
I seen a movie so single-mindedly obscene. If you cannot find anything in
this movie that offends you, I suggest a career in proctology. As long as
you have a strong stomach, don't let the obscenity scare you away. It is the
way this movie revels in filth that makes it entertaining. The story is as
follows: the boys see a movie by the Canadian duo Terrance and Phillip,
which warps their fragile little minds, which leads to America going to war
with Canada and a bunch of other stuff. _South Park BL&U_ sets out to be a
parody of a Disney movie, including the irrelevant music numbers. These
songs are probably the movie's best feature. The song from the Terrance and
Phillip movie is the best, but don't go singing it in public. Also, Cartman
sings his famous song, "Kyle's Mom is a Bitch." Despite being highly
enjoyable and quite quotable, this movie has two major flaws. First, Chef
does not sing. Chef's songs are always the highlight of the _South Park_ tv
show episodes. Second, and more importantly, the movie needed more of a
plot. Basically, the story served as a vehicle to lampoon popular culture,
especially Disney movies and censorship. While that would have been fine for
a 30 minute tv episode, it wears thin over the course of 90 minutes.
However, the movie has the grace to end on a strong note. The Cartman vs.
Saddam Hussien fight is both hysterical in its own right and an excellent
parody of an anime battle.
Ratings go like this: Abominable, Bad, Fair, Good, Very Good, Great, and
Perfect. As you might guess, most movies are Fair to Good. Very few movies
are either Abominable or Perfect.
--
Jesse Kopelman - thebruce@paonline.com
"It's not worth leaving, until you've worn out your welcome."

Author
Shane Burridge
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)  80m
Those who like to collect SOUTH PARK sound bites for their web pages will 
have their work cut out for them here.  See it with an audience of fans and 
you'll know what I mean - nearly every line gets a response.  It's a rare 
thing for an animated feature to be more dependent on the script than the 
animation itself, but that's pretty much the case here.  SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, 
LONGER AND UNCUT is the feature version of the hit cable TV series, and is 
really quite groundbreaking as animated features go, managing to attract the 
attention of mainstream boxoffice with scrappy, alternative material.  
Whether it ever screens on television in any form is another matter 
completely - this is the worst of the TV show's regular offenses taken to 
the nth degree.  Its two most puerile and irritating characters (a flatulent 
duo named Terrance and Philip) are the catalyst for the plot, which involves 
the South Park Elementary School kids sneaking into an R-rated movie and 
emerging with their vocabulary expanded considerably.  The mothers of the 
children -  this is trash imitating life, folks - immediately ask for 
reprisals to be taken against the film.  Of course these are the charges 
that creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone have been answering for months, and 
this is their magnificently infantile response.  I won't get into any 
polemic about how SOUTH PARK is setting a bad example for children, because 
as long as there have been cartoons there have always been sad individuals 
unable to grasp the concept of animation being an adult entertainment form, 
and the argument is pointless before it has even begun.  Nuff said.
SOUTH PARK is a riot (one line about menstruation kept me laughing for over 
a minute) but, as is usually the case, its humor is an acquired taste and it 
does help if you are familiar with the characters.  The pretext for getting 
all the children suddenly swearing is a logical one, given the absence of 
R-rated language in the television series (even though we all knew they were 
capable of it).  For the first half hour it's funny, but then too much 
weight is placed on this one idea as the film's central gag.  As is often 
the case with this sort of thing, the initial shock/humor of seeing the 
grade-schoolers using coarse language becomes routine with overuse.  It 
wouldn't have been self-censoring of Parker and Stone to have edited quite a 
bit of the 'R' language out, especially in the film's second half.  There 
would have been enough concessions included for series followers to 
compensate: Kenny's weekly death scene goes beyond the show's standard 
cut-out animation style into a fluid, three-dimensional afterlife; Cartman 
gets a reprise of his well-known pejorative ditty about Kyle's mother; 
there's some truly appalling and tasteless attacks on Saddam Hussein (but he 
deserves it, the jerk); and one unexpected semi-serious moment involving 
Kenny near the film's conclusion (which includes a line from BEAVIS AND 
BUTT-HEAD creator Mike Judge).  And then of course there are the songs.  As 
tiresome as these may seem in the Disney films and their imitators (which 
always slow the plot down with some sappy number in the hopes of netting an 
Oscar), in SOUTH PARK they are suitably short, funny and punchy, including a 
LES MISERABLES spoof and a zinger directed at those introspective, 
soul-searching ballad-monologues (featuring Satan). Surprisingly the songs 
are pretty good (My favorites would be the opening track and 'Just Say 
Mm'Kay').  It's too bad they won't be nominated for any Oscars though.  I 
would have loved to have seen the Terrance and Philip number performed at 
the Academy Awards.


Author
Nizam Ahmed
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
I recently had the chance to view a post-production VHS copy of the eagerly
awaited South Park movie. The film is in the final stages of
post-production: some frames of animation are not yet completed (they are
replaced by a series of stills) and some of the dialogue track is to be
redubbed. Otherwise, the film is pretty much ready for release - the story
is clear and all the dialogue is present, voiced by all the correct actors.
So, how does it fare? It kicks off in style as Cartman and the gang sneak in
to the brand new Terrence & Philip movie. This film-within-a-film ("Asses of
Fire") is a hilarious excuse for offensive bad-language (not bleeped!) and
vulgar toilet humour. It contains a brilliant musical number containing
nothing but four-letter words, clearly a celebration of the new-found
freedom SOUTH PARK's creators have found with an 18 certificate ('R' in the
US). Naturally, the South Park kids are impressed, and are soon repeating
the swearing at school. Soon, the news of the kids' foul mouths filters
through to the teachers and the parents, who are up in arms. The film then
turns into an unsubtle attack on a society of censorship, as the parents
point the blame at Terrence & Philip themselves, putting them on trial,
sentencing them to death, and declaring war on their homeland (Canada).
So far, so good. There are some brilliant gags and one-liners (as you'd
expect) and the relationship between Satan and Saddam Hussein is possibly
the sickest thing I've ever seen - so the film must be doing something
right.
Unfortunately, it seems that the natural length for SOUTH PARK is half an
hour. The film simply can't sustain the cartoons simple one-note inanity for
the full running time of the feature. All the best ideas are in the first
half-hour, after which SOUTH PARK begins to slide into repetition and
tedium. There is no denying the thrill of hearing the South Parkers swear
for real, but basing an entire film on this premise suggests laziness.
Certainly, its watchable and enjoyable enough (as any average episode of the
TV show is), but you get the feeling that SOUTH PARK has possibly exhausted
its format with this movie. There is very little left to explore, meaning
the film has to resort to cliched fantasy and war sequences.
The most irritating aspect of SOUTH PARK THE MOVIE is undoubtedly the boring
musical numbers. There are far too many of them, of which only one-or-two
are remotely amusing. They exist only as filler, padding the story out to
reach feature film length. Equally tedious is the sub-plot involving Kenny's
death (yes, he dies - no spoilers there).
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT is a fan's film. It is good to see that
the creators are not compromising their vision in an attempt to draw in a
more mainstream audience: this is as acerbic and cruel as any TV episode.
Unfortunately, as a fan's film, it follows the strict formula of 'more of
the same'. There is nothing particularly special here to distinguish it from
the TV show other than the swearing, some poor songs, and some snazzy
animation sequences.  Building it up as an 'event movie' is possibly a
mistake: it would be more at home as a sell-through video release.
This film's potential under-achievement, combined with the TV show's
dwindling audience figures in the States, could well spell the end of the
SOUTH PARK franchise. This may be a blessing in disguise. Parker & Stone are
undoubtedly talented people, and it may be time for them to move on to
projects new: the clear parallel is with a similarly controverial cartoon,
BEAVIS & BUTTHEAD, which ended with a major motion picture, to be replaced
by the more emotionally rich and mature KING OF THE HILL.
So, in conclusion, SOUTH PARK THE MOVIE just about stands on its own merits,
and all fans should certainly see it, not least because it may be the last
you will ever see. It was fun while it lasted, but no more SOUTH PARK
please.

Author
Homer Yen
I've never actually the seen the Comedy Central offering about life in
a mountain redneck town' called South Park.  But it's reputation is
certainly well known as a show filled wall-to-wall with words that moms
would be shocked to hear.  And film always has a way of elevating the
relative tameness found on TV. `South Park: Bigger, Louder and Uncut'
elevates full throttle to the limit.  It couldn't be any more raunchy,
shameless, and obscenity-laden.  Parents bewareif you're children are
asking for a few dollars to go to some art film, you'd better follow
them because they are on there way to see this film.
I'm only sending out this warning because the obscene language goes
beyond excessive.  Yet, there is a definite intelligence at work here
as a vicious social satire about our ever-degenerating culture and
societal norms.  The creators of `South Park' probably realize that
they're pushing the envelope in every scene, and are smart to work in
obvious references that stuff like `South Park' can only do more harm
than good although in the short term, it can be kind of funny.  Witness
for example the first 15 minutes where we meet up with four familiar
foul-mouthed friends (Stan, Cartman, Kyle, and Kenny  well, he speaks
with a muffle).  They take some money from their mom under the pretense
that they are going to an art film.  Instead, they bribe a bum to buy
tickets for them to the newly released `R' rated movie called Terrence
and Philip'.  This film is filled with non-stop vulgarity and bathroom
jokes.   In the first five minutes, the `F' word is said umpteen times
while Terrence and Philip commence a song and dance routine where at
precise moments, various people all break wind.  The various tones and
lengths create a pseudo-wind concerto.   I almost laughed, although I'm
ashamed to admit it.  The four young boys soak it all in while all of
the other patrons begin to leave the theatre.  The incredible thing was
that at that exact same moment, the same thing happened in my theatre. 
People got up and left.  To be able to sit through this film really
requires some discipline and open-mindedness.
The kids take everything that they've learned from this film and
proudly go about their elementary school repeating phrases to everyone
from friends to teachers to the principal.  The mothers are all aghast
and take arms against Canada, the country that produced the film. 
Don't blame usblame those pesky northern neighbors.  The mother's
lobby to execute Terence and Philip as treasonous prisoners of war
while the children contemplate the consequences of their action and
reflect the values that are at stake.  But as with most cartoons that
try to stretch from 30 to 90 minutes, a lot of it loses its razor-sharp
tenacity.  To compensate, there are also sub-plots about little Stan's
infatuation for a fellow female schoolmate (the running joke is that
every time he opens his mouth, he throws up on her face), and the
coming of Satan which will occur if Terrence and Philip are executed.  
`South Park' does tell its story with energy and with song.  In fact,
the structure is much like a traditional musical.  There are a few
catchy tunes such as the introspective `What Would Brian Boitano Do?'
and a catchy, march-like `Blame Canada'.  Most impressive was a
well-orchestrated production number that ably connected all of the
separate plots.  Still, given the frankness of the language and the
non-stop lowbrow humor and wonton destruction, I can't, with any sense
of integrity, recommend this film.  However, I did think that this film
held together better than Wild Wild West.  And in a few instances,
there were flashes of wisdom and intelligence that really made me take
notice (the undertones of freedom of speech and the blind reckless
abandon to which overprotective mothers defend their children, for
example).  If you do see it, prepare to be shocked.


Author
Scott Renshaw
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT
(Paramount)
Voices:  Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes.
Screenplay:  Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady.
Producers:  Trey Parker & Matt Stone.
Director:  Trey Parker.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult themes, adult humor, cartoon violence,
sexual situations)
Running Time:  81 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT is crude and profane.  It's
more-than-occasionally offensive.  It's naughty just to see how much
naughtiness you can get away with.  It's repetitious in its dependence on 
obscenity from the mouths of babes.  In short, it's everything critics of
the Comedy Central series "South Park" have accused it of being for three
years, with the added benefit of including several hundred choice R-rated
profanities.  This is about as vile and inexcusable as comedy film-making
gets, a distillation of everything people fear popular culture is doing to
our sensibilities, and I laughed so hard I thought I'd harm an internal
organ.
     There's no question that "South Park" is for a very specific taste,
or lack thereof.  Even those who had been embracing the series now seem to
have tired of Trey Parker and Matt Stone's crass market approach to
grabbing laughs, as evidenced by the show's plummeting ratings.  BIGGER,
LONGER & UNCUT's missed jokes and sniggering immaturity probably wouldn't
surprise even the staunchest "South Park" fan; its sporadic brilliance may
surprise everyone.  The premise is a reflexive commentary on "harmful"
film-making, with the show's four young pals -- Eric Cartman (Parker),
Stan Marsh (Parker), Kyle Broflovski (Stone) and Kenny McCormick (Stone)
-- learning some interesting words from an R-rated feature film starring
scatalogical cartoon stars Terrance & Phillip.  The children's profane
outbursts cause a parental panic in which Terrance & Phillip's home nation
of Canada is held accountable for many societal ills.  War with our
neighbor to the north ensues, as well does a preparation for the
Apocalypse by Satan and his new lover Saddam Hussein.
     The broad pot-shots at censorship and moralistic hysteria aren't
surprising coming from Parker and Stone, who have been heralded as
harbingers of the Apocalypse themselves.  They get in a few swipes at the
MPAA (which branded Parker's ORGAZMO with an NC-17), taking particular aim
at the greater concern with vulgarity than with violence.  Also in their
crosshairs are nationalistic fervor, happy-talk psychology, Internet
pornography and media sensationalism, all compared to the relatively
mundane sin of potty-mouthing.  The target may be easy and some of the
jokes obvious, but Parker and Stone keep the chuckles coming at the
expense of those who would condemn them.
     As it turns out, the film is far less effective as social satire than
it is at pop culture parody.  You see, BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT is a
musical, with many of the numbers by Parker and composer Marc Shaiman 
patterned after the recent Disney formula.  There's a scene-setting
introductory number ("Mountain Town"), a song for the heroes' dilemma
("What Would Brian Boitano Do?"), a song for the villains ("Blame
Canada"), and a show-stopping production number ("It's Easy, Mmmkay").
Parker and Stone then switch gears to target LES MISERABLES, as the
children's "La Resistance" movement opposing their parents' proposed
execution of Terrance & Phillip generates numbers keyed to "One Day More"
and "A Little Fall of Rain."  The fifteen songs provide the film's most
riotous moments, including Terrance & Phillip's explosively obscene ode to
molestation and Satan's tender ballad about his quest for happiness.  You
may never feel guiltier about laughing harder.
     A style like Parker and Stone's, similar to scattershot predecessors
like Mel Brooks and the Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker team, is bound to produce
its share of duds like the go-nowhere jabs at a perpetually horny Saddam
Hussein.  Many viewers will just be turned off by the use of homosexuality
or military racism as punch lines, or even the whole idea of 
easily-influenced kids in today's charged post-Columbine High climate.  
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER & UNCUT isn't going to make anyone prouder to
be an American, or any less convinced that movies are all about shock
value. It's not even going to earn points for preaching to the choir about
letting parents do the job of parenting.  It may do nothing more than
leave you choking back the laughs for fear of acknowledging the power of
your inner 12-year-old.

Author
Ross Anthony
Yes, it's offensive and rude and lewd and I don't feel comfortable with the
idea that kids are probably going to have access to it, but ... man, it's
funny!
I'd seen a few "South Park" episodes (the cable series) -- had a few good
laugh, but never tuned in regularly. I liked the off-shoot (pardon the pun)
film "Basketball," but found "Orgasmo" lacking. So I certainly had my doubts
about how "South Park" (this underdog cartoon series that grew from a
underground Christmas Special spoof) would take to the big screen. Would it
look small? Would it look stupid? Would I have wasted my time? Simply put:
"South Park" the movie takes to the screen like a rabid pitbull to a
maceless, bare-butted postal carrier.
In an age where so much language is first cleared through politically
correct filters; a film like "South Park" is a painful reminder of first
amendment rights. Frankly, it's refreshing in a blatantly revolting way.
Don't get me wrong, I strongly feel that it's good not to offend people.
However, there are also times when we begin to take our wonderful
differences too seriously; seeing them as topics to be avoided as not to
accidentally offend. We sometimes lose our good humor, choosing to be
impersonal rather than impolite. Not only can that dilute truth and artistic
license, but we may actually be making ourselves easier to offend. Perhaps,
it's a good thing to let people make fun of us from time to time -- a shot
in the arm.
Though I don't think they do it for any other reason than to confuse their
attackers, creators Matt and Trey make another point: "It appears that to
the American public horrific gory violence is acceptable viewing material --
but naughty language somehow crosses the line." It's a very third-grade
remark, not unlike "Why punish me? Look what Timmy is doing!!!" Still ... it
really got me thinking. Should we be that upset if our children swear? I
contemplated that question. If my kid is good and loving, and non-violent --
should I care if he swears? Perhaps, I too, am stuck in tradition. The fact
is I do care ... and, if I were you I wouldn't take my kids to this movie.
(In all fairness, I wouldn't take them to "Pulp Fiction" either.)
What it's about:
Underneath a thick layer of pottie-mouthed grade-schoolers, PC-crushing
offensive humor, and sex scenes with Saddam Hussein, "South Park" the movie
is all about its own controversy: namely censorship. Canadian movie stars
(animated characters): Terrance and Philip (never at a loss for a fart joke)
play out the saga of Matt and Trey under fire for corrupting the youth of
America.
"South Park" in their own words:
MS: You could say it's about the struggle for basic, inalienable freedoms in
the face of oppression, but you'd sound like a jerk.
TP: Just read "Moby Dick" and every time you come across the word "whale"
replace it with "Canadian".
What every parent should know:
There is A LOT of swearing. And not just the usual "F" and "S" word and
every conceivable combination thereof ... but, variations on these themes so
colorfully creative that you'd be hard pressed to think of any other verbal
projection you'd hate worse to pass into your child's ear. In fact, you'd
probably rather have a wasp get caught up in there than these obscenities.
These guys are experts -- they earn millions making cute little cartoon
characters swear like you and me with lit bottle rockets up our shorts.
It's the contrast that strikes the funny bone with a guilty chord:
"South Park" (the movie) is a musical (Parker's band writing most of the
lyrics). They set your heart warmly pumping with that magical "Disney
feeling" just to swat you like a blood engorged mosquito. The humor is
furthered with a third contrast -- sincerely intriguing and profound
thoughts. In "sensitive" Satan's big number he sings ... "Without evil there
can't be good, so it's got to be good to be evil sometimes." And in another
buoyant ditty delicately entitled "Blame Canada," America goes so far in
looking for outside causes to condemn for its own children's bad behavior,
that good old fashioned parenting somehow gets overlooked as a viable
response to the situation.
Done very well...
The Heaven and Hell sequences. George Clooney's cameo. The integration of
music. The fast pace and high energy. And ...you'll leave the theater
thinking about this movie and issues it speaks to for a long time.
Weakest link:
After a while, the verbal obscenity strings lose their shock value and
ironically, perhaps like "Clockwork Orange" (hinted at in the film),
actually may make some viewers sick of swearing.
My last word:
"South Park" is an explosively funny, openly offensive, shockingly
unsettling movie that surprisingly makes some poignant statements about a
1990's America. It teases and pokes at our favorite Pandora's boxes and then
rips their lids off without hesitation. It specifically ribs various racial
and gender groups so graphically, that one might easily miss the biggest
butt of the joke -- 20th century America. Not only that, but it has already
spoofed our responses before we speak. If you truly don't like that sort of
thing: then don't see it, don't talk about it, and raise your children well.
If you choose to protest, you'll just be fueling the flames.
Written by Trey, Matt and Pam. Directed by Trey.
Produced by Matt Stone and Trey Parker at Warner Bro's/Paramount/Comedy
Central.
Rated R -- Eek, don't let kids watch!
Grade..........................A-
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Walter Frith
'South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut' (1999)
Trey Parker and Matt Stone are two angry generation x members actually
making it in the big time world of animation.  Adult animation that is.  The
way they express themselves through the use of controversial subject matter
is designed to test your tolerance (or lack of it) and I admire them for it
because their work is so absurd and outrageous, it's genuinely funny.
Taking little kids and putting them in a world of being brought up poorly
and lacing their dialogue with four letter expletives is sort of like the
old pie in the face routine.  It looks funny unless it happens to you.  And
if you take it for what it is, realizing that it's tongue in cheek, you
can't lose.
'South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut' shows how Parker and Stone have built
up their academic style like a powder keg.  Not being able to do a lot of
the things contained in this film on television have actually made them turn
this film on the general public in the form of a wild animal as the NOT FOR
TELEVISION subject matter comes falling on you like a hail storm.
All your favourite characters are back for a run in the adventure of their
lives.  Kyle, Stan, Kenny and Eric do what all little kids have done in the
past.  They sneak in to see an R-rated film to see two Canadian actors named
Terrence and Phillip perform profanity in the form or dirty jokes and foul
mouthed songs and come out imitating everything they've seen.  Their parents
and community leaders are shocked and blame everything on the culture
contained within the film.  Before you know it, the president of the United
States has declared war on Canada and U.S. patriotism goes awry with
t-shirts and other merchandise knocking Canada and that is only the start.
This is all done, of course, in a humourous manner.  As a Canadian myself, I
was quite amused at the way our mannerisms are portrayed in the film.  The
Canadian animated characters heads are cut in half and the top part of their
head jumps every time they speak.  We did give the world insulin, the
telephone and basketball but this is truly the most amazing feat we have
ever pulled off!
"Oh my God, they killed Kenny!"  This is common in every episode of 'South
Park' on television where Kenny always dies and this phrase is blurted out.
Well, why leave it out in the movie?  Kenny dies and goes to hell where he
meets Satan and discovers that since Saddam Hussein, who dies in the film,
and Satan are lovers and that the war between Canada and the United States
will allow the devil to come back and rule the world with his lover by his
side.  Absurd!  And you may find yourself embarrassed at the fact that
you're laughing through all of this.
Like most animated features, this one runs out of steam near the end but is
so entertaining in its first hour that the momentum of that accomplishment
actually holds the rest of the film together like glue.  What Parker and
Stone are really doing in this film is testing not just tolerance levels but
their test is also to see if hypocrisy levels are also at a high level of
occupation.  They deliberately take a near utopia haven like Canada and make
it the focus of all that is wrong and evil in the world when just the
opposite is true.  They allow adult cynicism, seen in both the adults and
kids in the film to flow like blood from an accident victim.
There is a deep rooted dramatic message contained within 'South Park:
Bigger, Longer and Uncut' and I'm sure that when it takes its place in
history with other adult cartoons like 'Fritz the Cat', 'Watership Down' and
'Beavis  Butt-head Do America', it will stand the test of time when examined
in later years.  Now, how about a big screen 'Simpsons' movie!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Trey Parker.
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Isaac Hayes, George Clooney, Mike Judge, 
Minnie Driver.
1999 - 82 minutes
Rated R (for cartoon violence, non-stop profanity, sexual situations, nudity, 
and everything else under the sun).
Reviewed July 1, 1999.
If you've seen the popular animated television series, "South Park," which 
airs on cable's Comedy Central, you'll know that each and every episode's 
purpose is to be as offensive as possible, thus generating laughs of 
near-disbelief, and these unbelievable storylines ultimately collide with 
often shocking adult language, particularly for television. Nothing, however, 
could prepare you for the vulgar, perverse, outrageous, raunchy, 
filthy-mouthed experience that is "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut," the 
very first big-screen adaptation of the sitcom, directed by Trey Parker. No 
doubt only saving itself from the NC-17 (No Children Under 17 Admitted) 
rating because it's a cartoon rather than live-action, the R-rated film is a 
full-out, and well-articulated, attack on the bogusness of the MPAA (Motion 
Picture Association of America) rating system, no doubt due to Parker's 
unfortunate experience with them last year when they rated his comedy, 
"Orgazmo," NC-17, even though it had next to no sex and even very little 
harsh profanity.
As afficionados can attest to, the protagonists of "South Park," a wintry 
town up north, are a group of potty-mouthed elementary school friends, Stan, 
Kyle, Cartman, and Kenny (whose speech is always muffled due to the tight 
hood of his jacket, and who dies in a freak accident on each episode, to the 
exclamation of his friends, "Oh my god, they killed Kenny"). As the film gets 
rolling, the four boys are excitedly off to see the very first Canadian-made 
"Terrence and Phillip" movie, based on their own favorite T.V. show about two 
childish men who fart a lot. Distraught when they are turned away by the 
theater worker due to its R-rating, they successfully pay a homeless man to 
get them into the movie, and three hours later, after sitting through an 
endless stream of shocking curse word upon curse word , come out of the 
theater with, shall we say, an increased and rather colorful vocabularly. 
When word gets out about the controversial film, and when all of the children 
of South Park have been transformed from "innocent" kids into 
profanity-spewing monsters, the parents, headed by Kyle's witch with a 
capital "B" mom, create an organization called "Mothers Against Canada," 
believing that the titled country is at fault for the corruption of today's 
youth. Soon Terrence and Phillip find themselves facing execution, and it is 
up to the young South Park gang to band together to set them free and make 
their elders listen to reason. Meanwhile, Kenny, who is inevitably killed 
early on and sent to Hell after not being admitted beyond the pearly gates 
(and naked angels) of Heaven, discovers that Satan and the recently-deceased 
Saddam Hussein are full-fledged lovers plotting to take over the world of the 
living the minute the guilty television duo are murdered. 
What may surprise "South Park" fans is not only how far this film goes over 
the deep end of tastelessness, but that it is a musical, albeit a demented 
Disney-style one. Filmmaker Trey Parker (who also does many of the voices 
along with partner Matt Stone) has had a talent of creating memorable tunes, 
from 1997's bloody comedy, "Cannibal: The Musical," to "Orgazmo," and here he 
has succeeded once again. Some of the catchy showstoppers include "Uncle 
Fu**a," which literally caused me to laugh so hard I teared up, to "Kyle's 
Mom's a Bitch," whose lyrics are hysterically translated into several foreign 
languages, to "I Can Change," a solemn solo song sung by Saddam Hussein, who 
wants to prove to Satan that he cares about more than just meaningless sex 
with him.
Loaded with a non-stop barrage of exaggerated profanities, including at least 
100 uses of the F-word alone, the film goes so far in the opposite direction 
of how "cute 'n' cuddly" animated films are supposed to be made, you can't 
help but simply laugh with an equal measure of shock and glee at the overall 
craziness, as well as brazenness, of it all. 
Also, as is usual with the show, the film has targeted many celebrities, both 
living and dead, and has used them as the butt of a many insulting jokes. 
Most uproarious honors go to the Baldwin brothers, Brooke Shields (voiced by 
Minnie Driver), the late George Burns, and especially Winona Ryder (who is 
portrayed doing something truly unthinkable with a round of ping pong balls). 
Nary a target is left unabused by director Parker: politicians, right-wing 
extremists, organizations, gays, Jews, religion, small-town family "values," 
and at the forefront, the rating system. Usually a bad sign signifying an 
absence of thought, the movie also includes as many sex, language, bathroom, 
and fart jokes to last a lifetime, and to my amazement, they actually work 
here because there is a bit of sly wit behind the more showy humor.
I'd love to say "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut" is a great movie, both 
for its forthright willingness to gain laughs and courageousness in the 
mainstream film industry, but there are several problems to be had. For one, 
at an already-brief 82 minutes (which may seem rather pat), the picture 
overstays its welcome and runs out of a lot of steam in its climax. It never 
grows boring or even tedious, but the jokes (or at least the ones that work) 
slow down quite a bit. Tight editing of maybe ten minutes might have done the 
trick to keep the pace, and fun, at a maximum level. There was also a minor 
height of disappointment in that one of the show's most rib-ticklingly 
hilarious characters, Mr. Hanky, the Christmas Poo, is nowhere to be found. 
One of the series' running characters, Chef (voiced by Isaac Hayes), also 
doesn't obtain an ample amount of screen time, and in a movie filled with 
music, is unfairly not given one song to sing. A rousing rendition of his 
classic "Salty Balls" would have definately done the trick. 
Still, it is extremely difficult to adapt a 30-minute cartoon of the same 
brand of extreme humor to almost an hour-and-a-half, but Parker has done a 
fabulous job under the circumstances, proving that not only is he good with 
voices, but is also a fine director and a smart writer who knows how to steal 
laughs from an audience. Something tells me that not only will fans of "South 
Park" like this first foray into feature films, but those unfamiliar with the 
series will also quickly catch on to the hard-edged humor and end up being 
won over themselves at the sheer stupidity of it all. I'm not sure a second 
"South Park" movie would be a good idea (after all, what could possibly be 
done the next time around that wasn't done here?), but as it stands alone, 
you almost certainly couldn't find a funnier, or (disregarding its mediocre 
finale) more entertaining, movie out in theaters right now.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Jeff Jenkins
  Those loveable kids from TV's South Park have hit the big 
screen! In South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut Trey Parker and 
Matt Stone push the envelope for offensiveness and vulgarity far 
beyond that which was previously seen in the television show. 
The result is a hilarious comedy not for those of a weak 
constitution.
  The premise has the gang going to see a Terrance and Phillip 
movie where they learn a plethora of new obscenities. When the 
parents find out they begin a protest against the movie which 
leads to Terrance and Phillip being arrested and a war with 
Canada (Terrance and Phillip's home country). The story plays 
out like an old MGM musical with the songs advancing the plot 
(although Ethel Merman never sang any songs like these!).  And 
what great songs they are! From the hilariously irreverent "What 
Would Brian Boitano Do?" to Satan's rendition of the ballad "Up 
There" to Big Gay Al's extravagant "I'm Super, Thanks For 
Asking" to some others which are too vulgar to mention, these 
songs will be buzzing in my brain for some time to come.
  The animation is typical South Park (sort of a Peanuts on 
construction paper look) with the exception of the afterlife 
scenes involving Kenny. The scenes of hell are computer 
generated and look like something straight out of Dante's 
Inferno. Plus there are a few computer generated effects like 
explosions and such in other parts of the film.
  This may be the most vile, offensive, and vulgar piece of 
animation ever created. It's also the most hilarious movie I've 
seen in a long time. If any part of the movie offends you, don't 
worry, it's meant to offend everyone. If you're a fan of the 
show, don't miss the movie. But be warned, don't bring the kids.

Author
Jerry Saravia
I am not sure what I expected from this feature-length version of the cult
animated series but certainly not the high-voltage blast of laughs I got from
this "redneck mountain town." South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut is a spry
surprise: a delightful, profane and inventive film guaranteed to offend, upset
and, most significantly, incite laughter from many audience members. 
Our good old cardboard cut-out buddies, Cartman, Kyle, Stan and Kenny are back
- this time, they are giddy trying to get in to see an R-rated film called
"Asses of Fire," which stars two movie stars, Terrance and Phillip. Naturally,
they can't get in so they bribe a homeless man into buying them tickets. After
seeing the profane film, the South Park kids litter their mouths with
four-letter words and objectionable phrases galore. Their parents are outraged
and insist on causing a media stir by claiming that the movie is dangerous, and
this all results in a war with Canada and a face-to-face encounter with Satan
and Saddam Hussein!
"South Park" does not shy away from delivering on its promise as indicated by
the title. The movie is bigger (there's a deliciously hellish Inferno
sequence), longer (a bit too long even at eighty minutes), and uncut (and proud
of it, too). There is enough here to draw ire from all social groups concerned
with demeaning values, deteriorated morals, and bad taste in the cinema
offerings of today. In a sense, the creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone comment
on such issues by making a movie about them (apparently, they fought long and
hard with the MPAA over maintaining an R rating for this movie). This is a
great, postmodernist hook for "South Park," and it is possible that the series
could be enlivened greatly with such inventiveness. 
There are many good jokes concerning Winona Ryder, Bill Gates, the Baldwins,
the Internet and the litter of adult websites, electric-shock V-chips,
abortion, Satan and Hussein's romp in the hay, the question of censorship,
parental responsibility versus the media's towards the young, etc. Is this a
comedy or a political film? Both, and it was smart and timely for the creators
to invest such interest in today's post-Littleton, Colorado issues. Name one
other recent film with this much political commentary.
"South Park" runs out of steam after a while partly due to the numerous
song-and-dance numbers (some are funnier than others). The characters are still
quite engaging (the mortal Kenny is still my favorite) and the situations are
clever and involving (the attempt to save the movie stars from possible
execution is hilarious). I may draw some ire for saying this but "South Park"
should be seen by kids under 18. It is important and addresses many issues with
wit and obscenities galore. It is a film of the times, it is about us, and it
is about how we live now. Whoever thought a cartoon could have this much
potential? 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Brandon Herring 
Rated R for strong language, crude sexual humor, violence and some nudity.
Voices.....Trey Parker, Matt Stone, George Clooney, Minnie Driver.
"South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" is undoubtedly crude, offensive,
mean-spirited movie, that comes off as a politcally correct movie too. If your
Canadian, a strong Christian, fat, gay or anything else, you will be offended.
But when you watch this movie, there is no doubt that you will laugh.
Based on the wildly popular Comedy Central TV show, South Park stars Cartman,
an overweight , foul-mouthed kid, with attitude, and a sweet side. Kenny, a
poor kid who gets killed in every episode, and talks with his coat hood
covering his head. Stan a regular, sometimes boring kid who has problems with
women. And Kyle a lonely jew who talks to his poop.
The movie opens with a funny, but messageable song, that all of the people of
South Park sing. Cartman, Stan, Kenny and Kyle are very excited to see the new
Terrance And Phillip (Beavis and Butthead types) movie "Asses of Fire". But
when the kids get up to the movie to get the tickets, they learn the movie is
rated R, which of course means that anyone under the age of 17 cannot get in
without a parent or legal guardian. The kids do not understand this, and they
pay a homeless man to buy their tickets.
While in the movie, laughing at the movie, Terrance and Phillip cuss repeatedly
entertaining the kids. They kids then go out and cuss themselves, getting in
trouble and causing Kyle's mom to go against the MPAA. While doing this Kenny
learns a thing or to, by proving to Cartman he can light his fart on fire.
Kenny does so, dies, and goes to hell, to find out that Satan and Saddam
Huiessan (homosexual lovers), are about to take over the world, if Terrance and
Phillip die.
>From here on, nothing more should be said to keep the rest a surprise. But
believe me, this isn't your regular South Park TV show, and should not be seen
by anyone under 14 or more. This film contains extreme profanity (over 130 "f"
words and a collection of others). But beyond being bad in a tasteless type
way, South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut has many messages that are embedded
inside it. But I bet you will not leave the movie, for at least laughing one
time or more. And enjoying yourself. Take it from me, South Park: B, L, and U,
isn't as good as you'd hope, but it is good for some laughs.
Reviewed: July 14th, 1999.
Brandon Herring
Movie Review Heaven
(http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/movie/3160/moviereviewheaven.html

Author
John Beachem
CAST
Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Mary Kay Bergman perform almost all the voices
The is perhaps the first time I have ever been tempted to walk out of a movie,
go to the box office, and demand half of my money back. The first half is
really quite hysterical, and is very true to the television show (which I am a
fan of). The second half, on the other hand, is awful. It spends the entire
time attempting to insult everyone on the planet, and doing little else. I must
say though, I think the film did pull off its goal in this department.
The plot revolves around Stan, Kyle, Cartmen, and Kenny (of course) sneaking
into an R rated movie which stars their favorites Canadian television stars
Terrence and Phillip. They come out of the film knowing a whole slew of bad
words, which they proceed to use quite often in front of everyone including
their parents. The parents (led by Kyle's mother) immediately blame the
Canadians for this, and before you know it Canada and the US are at war.
Meanwhile, Kenny, who died earlier of course, is down in hell with Satan and
Satan's new lover, Saddam Hussein. The two of them are planning on taking over
the earth, which will be made possible by the war above them for some reason.
Kenny hears of these plans and tries to warn the others.
I think the main problem here, is that Trey Parker and Matt Stone are used to
writing 30 minute television shows. In thirty minutes, they can throw in a
thousand jokes and keep you laughing throughout the entire thing. Here, rather
than simply spreading the jokes out a little thinner and keeping the audience
at least chuckling through the film, they cram them all into the first 45
minutes or so. This of course makes those 45 minutes hilarious, but then the
laughs suddenly stop. The theatre I was in was nearly silent for the entire
last half of the movie.
I've heard people say that the film was blunt and honest, and said things that
needed to be said. For the life of me, I can't think of what any of these
things were. The only part that I thought was truly honest, and made sense was
the little jab at the MPAA rating system. I believe the line was something like
"they can have as much gore and violence as they want in movies, as long as
they don't use any naughty words." I'd also better warn all you conservatives
out there. Unless you can really take a joke well, stay far away from this
film.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Paramount Pictures/Warner Bros
 Director:  Trey Parker
 Writer:  Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady
 Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac
Hayes, George Clooney, Minnie Driver, others
   Maybe the merchandising gimmick that targets films for
particular audiences should be abandoned, or at least
modified.  Market research people think that they can
determine what movies will appeal to distinct age, ethnic and
geographical groups.  Disney cartoons, for example, are
commonly intended for the small fry: parents are just nannies
who escort their kids to the animations to make them happy
and keep 'em quiet for a while.  Yet many adults are
fascinated by the simplest of these productions.  While a
case could be made that 5-year-olds would not appreciate
much in a Merchant-Ivory creation, the pros would probably
say that "South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" would 
entertain people who are politically liberal, culturally
broadminded, under 35 years of age, distrustful of authority,
wary of Broadway musicals, with little faith in doctors,
government, the military, computer software, and the benefits
of life in rural towns.  They would probably have cable and
would have logged in quite a bit of time on the "South Park"
series.  
   I don't have cable, had never seen a single minute of
"South Park," am over 35, can live with authority, have much
faith in organized medicine, am addicted to computers, find
rural towns clean and quaint, appreciate Broadway musicals,
am not attracted to cartoons, and have faith that the military
will continue to fight fascism as it has done so well this year. 
How would I measure up? I'd probably get a rating of about
30% from the "South Park" suits who'd write me off as a
potential viewer.  What's more I read on the Net from a critic
I respect that in his Atlanta community, audience members
over the age of 45 began leaving the advance screening in
droves halfway into the comparatively brief production.  
   What a difference an hour or so makes in one's attitude
toward something new.  Perhaps my never having seen an
episode of the TV series was a good thing.  The movie came
across to me as a fresh display of good, dirty fun, so that
while a veteran watcher (like another Net critic I read)
concludes his review, "no more 'South Park,' please," my
feeling is quite the opposite.  I look forward to the sequel.
  The film opens on a pristine town, the sort of place that
could well be on the Canadian border.  The mothers dote on
their kids, the snow is pure white, and the people are
uniformly saintly.  Just a minute passes, though, when
director Trey Parker introduces the cynicism that informs the
entire script, which has been written by Parker together with
Matt Stone and Pam Brady.  The homeless are ignored in
this authentic redneck village whose eight-year-old kids do
their darndest to get into an R-rated movie, bribing a
homeless man with money for a bottle of vodka if he would
get them the six tickets they need.  The movie, "Asses of
Fire," stars the Canadian comedy team Terrance and Philip,
whose incessant vulgarity is picked up by the kids (just as the
MPAA knew it would be).  As the youngsters curse their way
through the school day, leading the authorities to call in their
parents and set up counseling sessions, one mother leads
women throughout the area in a demonstration against
Canadian film-makers, culminating in a declared war between
the U.S. and Canada.
   "South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" is rumored to have
actually cut two or three minutes to bring it within MPAA
guidelines for a R rating--thereby avoiding the dreaded NC-17
assessment.  Trey Parker successfully lampoons the movie
rating board, doctors, Broadway musicals, parents, kids,
governments, the military, feminism, the school system, the
political correctness movement, Microsoft, idyllic little towns,
and liberal hypocrisy.  To do this in one of the briefest films
of the year requires a fast pace: "South Park" makes its point
in the crispest manner possible, relentlessly alternating
spirited songs with a flurry of ribald dialogue.   Though one
critic has said that "basing an entire film on vulgarity
suggests laziness," the sheer variety of skits belies this
judgment.  Fifteen songs, including the riotous "Blame
Canada" and "Mountain Town," inhabit this witty parody. 
While the subjects are sitting ducks for this sort of burlesque
(in one case a newscaster suggests that Canada has put out
peace feelers but here in the U.S. "as usual we're not
listening"), the obscene vituperations come from the mouths
of babes, making "South Park" a creative take on the genre. 
A considerable portion of the film--specifically the scenes
involving Satan and his relationship with Saddam Hussein--do
not work.  Saddam is so weakly lampooned that the Iraqi
dictator could almost clear the scenes for his country's TV. 
But generally, the dialogue, songs and colorful animation,
tossed at us in an energetic manner and rapid pace that dare
us to blink, make "South Park" an entertaining little treat
whose meanspiritedness might well bring smiles, guffaws--
even an occasional "oooo"--to your face.

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
This week, upon returning to Los Angeles from my summer vacation, I
tried to buy tickets to two separate R-rated films and was denied both
times. Despite the fact that I am under the age of 17, I am usually
let into the films because I look much older than I really
am(haha). The reason why I was not let in was because of President
Clinton's new "family man" policy, in which theatres must check the
I.D. of anyone trying to buy a ticket to an R-rated movie.
Because of this new law and the controversy surrounding it, there has
and never will be a better time to release the hilarious satire "South
Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut", despite the fact that the Comedy
Central TV series on which it is based has been steadily losing
viewers. The animated film unleashes its wrath on targets such as
Canada, Saddam Hussein, Brian Boitano, Winona Ryder, The Baldwins,
Satan and most of all, the MPAA, which threatened to slap the film
with an NC-17 rating.
The timely storyline is about four kids(the fat Cartman, the Jewish
Kyle, the braindead Kenny, and the "normal" Stan) who sneak in to an
R-rated Canadian movie called "Asses Of Fire", starring their favorite
comic duo, Terrence and Phillip. The two prance around, fart, sing
songs like "Uncle Fucka", and teach the "innocent" children words they
never knew existed(and we thought the TV show was vulgar).
Once the children spread the word(s) of the forbidden movie which they
have seen, and begin to curse nonstop, Sheila Broslofski(Kyle's
mother) decides to "Blame Canada", and when the Canadians bomb the
Baldwin residence, the war begins.
What follows is 80 minutes of the funniest and most shocking humor to
ever come out of "South Park" co-creators Trey Parker and Matt
Stone. Finally, a film with a scathing social message that I'm with
all the way. The songs are catchy and the characters are irreverent.
"South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" will remind viewers why we all
clung to the show in its first season, and why we will become fans
once again. Parker and Stone can speak, though indirectly, to and for
today's young people. "South Park" is a wake-up-call to a world in
which peace can supposedly be created by forbidding teenagers to see
R-rated movies.
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Brian Takeshita
You have probably heard that SOUTH PARK:  BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT is
offensive.  Well here's a little test.  Just ask yourself the
question, "Am I easily offended by anything, anything at all?"  If you
take more than three seconds to answer, this movie will probably
offend you.  For the rest of us, SOUTH PARK is a hilarious good time.
Yeah, that's right, I liked the movie.  For all its low-brow humor, I
laughed almost all the way through.
The film finds gradeschoolers Stan, Kyle, Cartman and Kenny excited at
the imminent release of a movie version their favorite TV show,
"Terrance and Phillip," which consists of the two title characters
passing gas for half an hour every day.  The kids march on over to the
theater, only to be denied entrance because the film is (gasp!) rated
R.  Ever resourceful, they enlist a homeless guy to buy them tickets
as their "guardian," and proceed to view the potty-humor-soaked
Terrance and Phillip movie.  What they soon find out is why the movie
is rated R - Terrance and Phillip start swearing up such a storm as to
make a stevedore blush.  Of course, after the initial shock wears off,
the kids love it and later go to school spreading the good words,
prompting more kids to go and see the movie.  Soon, nearly all the
kids of the small mountain town of South Park are worshipping at the
alter of the Terrance and Phillip movie, much to the chagrin of the
town's adults.  Mad as hell, Kyle's mom spearheads a movement to ban
the film, which soon grows into a declaration of war against the
country which Terrance and Phillip come from:  Canada.
As I said, SOUTH PARK is potentially very offensive, as it contains a
lot of swearing, graphic cartoon violence, and a bunch of sexual
references which don't even try to couch themselves as innuendo.
They're just out there.  But if you can get past all that, you're in
for a great time.  The jokes come fast and furious, often catching you
off guard, and although much of the humor is based on the fact that
you're listening to "kids" spouting profanity, it might surprise you
that some of it is actually quite sophisticated and satirical of the
real world.  Everything from history to current events to pop culture
is given little barbs, including the likes of the French underground
resistance, President Clinton, Bill Gates, and there's even a
climactic battle between Satan, Saddam Hussein, and Cartman which
draws not only upon RETURN OF THE JEDI, but also upon STAR TREK III:
THE SEARCH FOR SPOCK.
Talk about satire, the whole set up with the Terrance and Phillip
movie is basically a satire of the South Park movie itself.  Think
about it:  A show on TV that's pretty profane as it is makes the jump
to the big screen and with an R rating and just goes all out with the
foul language.  Kids have to sneak in because responsible parents
wouldn't take them (never mind that at the screening I went to, there
were several adolescents in the audience - maybe they found a homeless
guy of their own), and an uproar about the offensiveness follows suit.
Fairly insightful.
Additionally surprising is the fact that SOUTH PARK actually tackles
the fairly heady topic of censorship.  As Kyle's mom goes on her
crusade and recruits the town and the nation into making scapegoats
out of Terrance and Phillip, we see the development of a type of evil
that we've seen in history and which could resurface if we're not
careful.  No, we're not given anything new or groundbreaking, and the
message may be delivered in a somewhat ham-fisted manner, but you've
got to give the filmmakers (and South Park creators) Trey Parker and
Matt Stone credit for taking what could have been an hour and a half
of meaningless guilty-pleasure laughs and actually imbuing it with
meaning.
One of the delights of this film is that it's not just a movie, it's a
musical!  Yes, the South Park cast not only gets to shout vulgarities,
but also sing them in several of the musical numbers.  The songs are
actually quite catchy and in fact better than many numbers from other
"legitimate" musicals - Hey, not to be disrespectful, but "I Have
Confidence" from THE SOUND OF MUSIC really could have been better.
Accomplished screen composer Marc Shaiman, along with Trey Parker,
skillfully presents us with stirring music, and even manages to weave
several of the songs together in a rousing medley near the film's high
point, displaying the composer's familiarity with the conventional
musical and giving the film an added depth.  The only problem was that
I couldn't hear the lyrics in a lot of the big numbers, which I'm sure
would have had me laughing even more.
Another drawback lies in the fact that if you're not familiar with the
Comedy Central cartoon, you're probably not going to enjoy the movie
as much, since it brings in characters and conventions from the show
without taking the time to explain their significance or background.
For example, South Park followers will cheer the appearance of Big Gay
Al and his rendition of "I'm Super," but it's not going to mean a lot
to others.  On the other hand, the fact that Kenny gets killed and
goes to hell is a major part of the plot, but it won't impair the
enjoyment of those who don't know that Kenny gets killed in every
episode of the series (expect maybe one).  Suffice to say there's
still a lot of comedy packed into SOUTH PARK for non-fans to come away
laughing.  Just remember what I said about asking yourself if you're
easily offended.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes, numerous
cameo voices
Written by: Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Pam Brady
Directed by: Trey Parker
Running Time: 80 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 8, 1999
I guess I should start out by saying that I am a huge fan of the
animated series "South Park" which runs on Comedy Central.  I've
followed it since it's debut, and while it has had it's occasional ups
and
downs, overall it provides more laughs than any other show on
television,
cable or otherwise.  I should also point out that just because I'm a
huge
fan of the series didn't automatically guarantee this movie a high
rating.
There have been other shows that I have been a major supporter of that
didn't do much for me in their big screen outings (Twin Peaks:Fire Walk
With Me comes to mind immediately).
While South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut runs about four times as long as
an
episode of the television series, it never once wears out it's welcome
or
becomes tiresome.  As the story goes, the four main characters (Stan,
Kyle,
Cartman, and Kenny) sneak into their local multiplex to see the new
R-rated
Terrance and Phillip movie Asses of Fire.  When they emerge, they have
discovered even worse language than they use on a daily basis (thanks to
an
extremely profane yet irresistibly catchy musical number from Terrance &
Phillip).  This enrages their parents who blame Canada (Terrance and
Phillip are Canadian you see) and war is soon declared on our neighbors
to
the north.
What's encouraging about South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut is that isn't
just an R-rated version of the hit show.  Series creators Trey Parker
and
Matt Stone could have very easily made just another episode for the big
screen, but instead they've given us a movie with social commentary
about
hypocrisy, censorship, and (gasp!) parental responsibility.  Yes you've
read correctly... this movie has a message.  Don't let that scare you
off
though, there are more laughs in this film than you'd think would be
possible.
Parker and Stone hit a number of "sacred" targets in their film, but as
they've said in interviews "We're equal opportunity offenders".  No
single
organization or racial group is targeted more than another.  And what
makes
the potentially dangerous comedy work so well is because it is so absurd
in
it's presentation.  The situations which the laughs come from are so
outlandish that I personally can't see any of them as being offensive.
Sure the language is harsh, but if you've seen any R-rated movie before
there shouldn't be anything here that would shock you.
However, I don't advise you take your kids either.  It is definitely not
for youngsters unless you, as a parent, explain to your kids about "foul
language" and why it's not always appropriate in the REAL world.
Curiously, I think that many of the ideas and situations in this film
are
far "worse" than anything in Trey Parker's Orgazmo, which the MPAA rated
NC-17.  Why that film is rated NC-17 and this one is rated R goes to
show
the randomness of the current ratings board.
Surprisingly, it would to be hard to classify South Park:Bigger, Longer
&
Uncut as either a comedy or a musical.  Normally I abhor musicals, but
when
they are this funny and the songs are as memorable, I can overlook my
feelings.  And I have to give credit where credit is due.  I've taken a
couple of harsh shots lately at Marc Shaiman and his overblown scores in
films like Patch Adams and The Out of Towners.  In this case, the music
he
has written (along with Trey Parker, mind you) fits perfectly.  Mocking
all
different types of musical numbers from Disney animation to the grand,
sweeping musicals of the 60s to Les Miserables, everything works.  The
soundtrack album is a must have.  On a sidenote: I would have loved to
sit
it on the recording sessions to see the chorus singing some of the
extremely filthy lyrics they have to sing in this film.
South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut is a great time at the movies if you
love
the series, or if you just love to laugh.  Sure the animation is crude
and
you may say the humor is even cruder, but a lot of the comedy here
requires
a good bit of intelligence to "get".  Those of us who do get it have
something great to enjoy.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
South Park: Bigger, Longer, & Uncut (1999)
A Capsule Review by Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Trey Parker
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mike Judge, Eric Idle, Isaac Hayes,
Minnie Driver, George Clooney
Screenplay: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Pam Brady
Producers: Trey Parker, Matt Stone
Runtime: 80 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros./Paramount
Rated R: strong language, violence
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        I expected South Park:  Bigger, Longer, & Uncut to be offensive,
raunchy, and extremely funny, but I didn't expect it to be as
intelligently satirical as it is.  I can honestly say that no movie has
ever made me laugh harder than this one.  While walking out of the
theater, my friend, who is a South Park fan, told me that I probably got
more out of it not being familiar with the series (I've only seen one
episode).  Perhaps that's true; I was certainly laughing louder than
anyone in the audience.  And often I couldn't believe what I was
laughing at.
        The story has our four young heroes learning an assortment of
expletives from a Canadian movie; naturally, this leads to a heated
anti-Canadian climate, and a vicious war against them into which Satan
intervenes.  Created almost entirely by comic geniuses Trey Parker and
Matt Stone, the film attacks everything it can, including the MPAA, the
U.S. Military, social intolerance, small-town mentality, and Bill
Gates.  South Park overflows with profanities used in ways most of us
have probably never heard.  
        The film is so biting, so amazingly funny (I could *not* stop laughing
after the general shoots Bill Gates), that it comes as an immense
disappointment that the last twenty minutes are so bland.  Parker and
Stone focus too much on a strange homosexual relationship between Saddam
Hussein and Satan, and don't find the funniest way to end their film. 
But it's still a quick 80-minutes -- 80 of the funniest and most
culturally in-tune minutes I've ever sat through.  

Author
Frankie Paiva
You'll hear a lot of people say this, and I'm here to tell you it's 100% true.
There hasn't been a movie so dead on not only in it's comedy, but in current
events since Wag The Dog in 1997. Kenny, Cartman, Stan, and Kyle sneak into an
R-rated movie starring Candian comedians Terrance and Phillip who's main
concern is singing the audience songs about having sex with everything
imaginable (donkeys, uncles, mothers, etc.) this strikes a chord with the crude
3rd graders who begins quoting lines from the film. Several (hard) pokes at the
MPAA, anyone of an ethnical race or religion, and Canada (who gets poked the
hardest, which caused me to wonder if they'd re-edit the film to show "Blame
the United States" for Canadian viewers.) follow to ensure a wild comic ride
that reminded me of Election on swearing steroids. 
Is the film for kids? Nah, it's full of plenty homosexual jabs, profanity,
murders and pokes at celebrities (Winona Ryder and ping-pong balls! An unlucky
Bill Gates!) and other extreme and objectionable material to set off thousands
of concerned parents and activists. As Kyle's mother (who is the head of
M.A.C., Mothers Against Canada) says that these movies corrupt our youth,
there's another point (proven in the musical number "Kyle's Mom's A Bitch")
that the outcome of the children "affected" by this film depends on the
impressionability (if that's even a word) of the viewer. It all starts at home,
and this message is loud and through this movie that, while crude for some, is
controversial, political, and funny all at the same time.

Author
Bob Bloom
  South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Written 
by Trey Parker and Matt Stone. Directed by Parker.
 They will tell you it's only a cartoon. Wrong.  It is more  much more. 
It is an adult R-rated animated feature.
 This 80-minute movie also is offensive, raw, uncouth, profane, raunchy, 
raucous, satiric and hilarious.
 Going way beyond the restrictive bounds of television  even for cable's 
Comedy Central  South Park is a savage riff on parents, mores, morals, 
war, jingoism and patriotism.
 Canadians, especially, will probably want to picket this movie.
 Transferred from the small screen is that cute, crude group of kids, led 
by Cartman, Stan, Kyle and Kenny.
 The amazing aspect about the movie version of South Park is that Trey 
Parker and Matt Stone, the creators of the series and writers of the 
film, have created a mirthful musical.
 The movie contains about a dozen musical numbers, most of which spoof 
various musical movie and stage presentations.
 The storyline is basic. The youngsters sneak into an R-rated movie 
starring their favorite performers, the potty-mouthed Canadians Terrence 
and Phillip. The profane-ridden movie influences the third-graders and 
the entire child population of South Park as the kids, after seeing the 
movie, develop mouths that constantly need to be washed out with soap.
 Stan's mother goes on the warpath, and it leads to the arrest of the 
Canadian performers on The Conan O'Brien Show.  (Conan is so distraught 
about his part in their capture that he commits suicide by jumping out 
the window of his NBC studio.)
 Things escalate. Poor Kenny is again killed, and he is sent to hell. 
There, he uncovers a plot by Satan and his new lover, Saddam Hussein, to 
take over the world after the execution of Terrence and Phillip.
 The Canadian air force retaliates by bombing the Baldwin mansion, 
killing the entire acting clan.
 OK, even writing this sounds surreal. So let's wrap it up by saying 
Parker and Stone set out to offend and shock as many people as they can. 
That they succeed in doing.
 It is in-your-face comedy and satire. This is a movie that will have no 
middle ground. People will either see it more than once or walk out 
before the finale.
 No nation, religious group or ethnic group is spared Parker and Stone's 
barbs.
 The movie is tasteless, but it is done in such an artful way that all 
you can do is applaud the audacity of Parker and Stone. 
 South Park is an original, the funniest film of the year.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at 
cbloom@iquest.net.

Author
Jeremiah "Spassvogel" Rickert
     This movie was doomed, or assisted by, depending on how you
look at it, to be a political hot potato.  Its release followed closely
the Columbine shooting, and the alleged "crackdown" on childrens' access
to R-rated movies by the Cinema industry.  Ironically, Parker and Stone
claim that the MPAA was more concerned about profanity than violence.
Another humorous aside was a quote I heard from a parents' rights group
that yearned for the "innocent" satire of Beavis and Butthead.  
     The basic plot of the film involves our heroes, Kenny, Kyle, Cartman,
and Stan sneaking into the R-rated film starring Canadian TV stars
Terrance and Phillip, and emerging with a whole new vocabulary of
extremely profane phrases that they of course think are cool.  This comes
after the opening musical number that waxes poetic on the virtues of the
small, quiet, virtuous, little mountain town.  Their parents and teachers
are shocked by their language and Kyle's mom, who is known for getting
into just about every cause possible, starts a snowball of anti-Canadian
sentiment that ends with Terrance and Phillips arrested and sentenced to 
death and the U.S. declaring war on Canada.   The children also discover
that Satan and his boytoy, Saddam Hussein will unleash the apocalypse if
the blood of Terrance and Phillip is spilled.  It's up to the boys to
prevent the end of the world and save Terrance and Phillip from the
anti-Canada crusade spearheaded by Kyle's mom.
     I'll wager that the primary draw of South Park for most fans is
merely the toilet humor, and yes, this film has a *lot* of toilet humor.
The profanity is frequent and un-bleeped, unlike the television series.
There is just about every kind of offensive phrase and image that you can
pack into a film, however for some reason they didn't really directly
insult any religious groups, which was a slight surprise to me.
Underneath all of this nastiness, however, is a very good message, one
that I wish was more of a part of all of the Columbine fallout: That
parents need to parent their children.  Rather than be outraged that such
a film was produced, they need to tell their kids, hey, this is wrong.
The parents in this film see nothing wrong with starting a war, but never
actually talk to their kids about why they shouldn't have seen the R rated
film in the first place.
     The script does peter out a bit in the 2nd half.  The first half had
me laughing repeatedly and uncontrollably.  The jokes have three levels.
There's the 1st level that most people probably expect from south park,
and that is the toilet humor.  Secondly, there's a gift of parody that
Parker and Stone possess that references a number of other films and
aspects of pop culture.  Third, there is the overall irony of people
thinking that violence is less harmful to children than nasty language.
The 2nd half, in my opinion, had too much Saddam Hussein.  I think it's
funny the way they portray him, but his antics got old very quickly.  The
thing I liked most about this film were the musical numbers.  The music
and lyrics were written mostly by Trey Parker and he truly has a gift for
lyrical humor, and the music was top-notch.  I believe that Trey Parker
has the juice to actually write a sucessful musical-comedy on Broadway if
he wished.  
     Overall the film is extremely funny, creative, and has a better moral
message than most so-called serious films and television programs.  I also
think that the film had a better message that anything spewed forth by
politicians on both sides of the aisle.  It is not meant for children, and
I would hope that very few parents allow their children to see it.  Stone
and Parker themselves have said that it's intended by adults, and it's up
to parents to keep their children from watching it if they don't approve.
Just as it was with Beavis and Butthead, people have knee-jerk reactions
and are incapable of looking past the 1st level humor and appreciate grand
satire.  
Of the $4.75 I paid for the film, it was worth $8.00


Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        Since debuting on Comedy Central in 1997, "South Park"
has
continually pushed the envelope of good taste and challenged
the
conventional idea of what is and is not appropriate for
television.
The battle has not been an easy one: since the very first
episode
was aired, the network has been besieged by letters from angry
parents, religious organizations, and nearly every political
group in the country, all demanding the immediate cancellation
of
the series.  But the proof is in the Snacky Cakes: Trey Parker
and
Matt Stone, the show's creators, have demonstrated that
poo-poos and
profanity can not only entertain the masses, they can also mean
big
merchandising dollars.  Now they're gambling that they can take
the
premise (and its profits) to the next level.
        In the small "redneck mountain town" (according to the
opening song) of South Park, Colorado, life is quiet and
peaceful--
idyllic, even.  But the town's solitude is challenged when a
new
film opens at the local theater: "Asses of Fire," starring
Canada's
Terrence and Phillip (a comedy duo whose schtick revolves
entirely
around their ability to fart on cue).  Four of the local
children
(Eric Cartman, Stan Marsh, Kyle Broflovski and Kenny McCormick)
sneak in to see the R-rated movie, and are quite taken with the
new vocabulary words contained therein.  As is the way with
children,
they promptly begin showing off their new arsenal of colorful
phrases
at every possible opportunity.
        The community is outraged that four pure, innocent
children have been corrupted by the film (apparently they don't
watch the "South Park" TV show), and soon the president
declares
all-out war on Canada, the bastion of evil responsible for the
offending movie.  Terrence and Philip are sentenced to die, and
the boys hatch a plan to save their idols.  Even more is at
stake,
however: Kenny discovers that if Terrence and Phillip are
killed,
Satan and his lover, Saddam Hussein, will gain dominance over
the
world.
        Yes, that's right, the film is an all-out musical
affair,
with lots of singing and dancing.  Fear not, however: unlike
those
in recent Disney features, these tunes are actually memorable,
managing to stay imbedded in your head for days afterwards.
There's
"Mountain Town," the bouncy opening number which extols the
virtues
of small-town life; the inspirational "What Would Brian Boytano
do?";
the villainous "Blame Canada" (which recalls the positively
evil "Be
Prepared," from "The Lion King"); and a frantic rendition of
the toe-
tappin' "Kyle's Mom's a Bitch" (an "It's a Small World"-type
sing-
along), which is guaranteed to offend absolutely everyone.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Jamey Hughton
As South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut opens, the citizens of the
famous mountainside town are celebrating life's good fortune. The birds
are chirping, the sun is shining, and the friendly inhabitants are
smiling gleefully as they skip down the street to an upbeat tune. Enter
the foursome of Cartman, Kyle, Stan and Kenny, the infamous group of
elementary school children that the TV show is based upon. They see an
ad bearing the names of their favorite fart-lighting duo of Terrance and
Phillip, who are appearing in their very first feature length movie (a
Canadian production). And so they venture forth to the local cineplex,
where they are shamefully turned down from seeing this graphic, R-rated
feature. After bribing a homeless man to accompany them as their
`parental guardian', the boys make it in to watch the movie, unaware
that the profane language they learn will soon thereafter destroy their
quiet and peaceful town.
South Park is a TV show that grew immensely popular on Comedy Central.
Mostly, of course, with the less demanding younger viewers, who found
the idea of swearing and offensive cardboard children to be just their
cup of tea. Now that co-creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone are free of
their television rating confines, they have pushed the envelope as far
as it can possibly go. The South Park movie is more raunchy, vulgar and
repeatedly crude than anything you have probably ever seen. The
obscenities flow so consistently that unwilling viewers may be scarred
for life, left to babble on in profane gibberish. The reason the film
exists is that Parker and Stone can take revenge on the MPAA (that's the
Motion Picture Association of America), with whom they've experienced a
complicated past. But, they won't stop there.
How many groups, minorities and individuals does the South Park movie
stab in the back? With the exception of the MPAA, there is (*ahem*)
black people, Jewish people, gay people, Anne Murray, Celine Dion, Jar
Jar Binks, the Baldwin brothers, Saddam Hussein, Brian Boitano, Bill
Gates, Barbara Streisand, and most blatantly of all: Canada! Parker and
Stone have cross-referenced all the inventive ways to make fun of we
Canadians, from speech patterns to flag-wearing and beyond. It would be
advisable for anyone who is easily offended to avoid this film, at ALL
costs.
But back to the plot. After the South Park children begin to utter
shocking four-letter words as part of their regular vocabulary, the
mothers take action. Forming MAC (Mothers Against Canada), they take
their case to President Clinton, forcing him to proclaim war on the
neighboring country for polluting the American children's minds with
their obscene movie productions. Terrance and Phillip are thereby
scheduled to be executed, with a pre-celebrity bash including Winona
Ryder and Big Gay Al. The South Park children decide to band together,
stop the bloodbath, and save the lives of their acting icons before all
is lost.
Let me first say that I laughed. Lord help me, I nearly busted a gut
during some uproarious musical numbers. Yes, in case you didn't know
already, the South Park movie is basically a feature-length animated
musical. The lyrics are often side-splitting and many of the songs have
an enjoyable beat, especially the re-enactment of the widely cherished
`Kyle's Mom's a B--ch', performed with eager enthusiasm by Cartman
himself. As a sub-plot, Kenny sets himself on fire while attempting to
light his own fart, and descends to hell. There he meets Satan, who is
having a heated affair with none other than Saddam Hussein. For such
(intentionally) crummy animation, there are some impressive
computer-generated visuals down below. Unfortunately, this and many
other offensive scenarios are almost too eager to cross the line into
disgusting vulgarity. South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut nearly
received an NC-17 from the MPAA, and for good reason; this film is not
for young audiences.
While a half-hour episode is nicely filling, the 90-minute movie begins
to lose fuel as it nears the conclusion. But some sequences are so
hilarious, and some pop culture references so cleverly placed, you just
have to appreciate the effort. South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut
breaks every rule in the book, and if you have the courage, you just
might find it entertaining.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
Spedersono
"South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut" (1999)
Directed by Trey Parker.  Written by Parker, Stone and Pam Brady.  With Voices
supplied by Parker, Stone and Isaac Davis.  Running Time: 80 minutes.  Rated
"R".
Having not actually ever seen a complete episode of Comedy Central's, "South
Park" I walked into the theatre not knowing what to expect.  I had only seen a
few minutes of the animated show on television once and although I found it
funny it did not prepare me for anything in the film version.
The film begins when the South Park kids (Cartman, Stan, Kyle and Kenny) make
their way the local theatre to see the new Canadian film, "Asses of Fire"
starring Terrance and Phillip.  After being informed by the ticket seller that
the film is "R" rated and that they need an adult guardian the kids bribe a
homeless man to by them the tickets.
The film, as the title promises, includes a lot of vulgarity.  After
experiencing three hours of non-stop cursing in the film, the kids' mouths
become filthy too.  Eventually, the rest of the kids in town see the film and
they too become "corrupted" by the Canadian duo.  Soon the mothers of these
kids form an organization called, "Mothers Against Canada" convinced that
Terrance and Phillip's home turf is responsible for the corruption of their
children and that the only way to stop any further damage is to execute them. 
Also, Kenny is killed and sent to Hell where he discovers that a recently
deceased Saddam Hussein and Satan are lovers and that they plan to take over
the world if Terrance and Phillip die.  Now, the fate of the world rests in the
hands of the South Park gang.
"South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut" is perhaps the most unexpected biting
social commentary you'll see in a film this year.  No target is too low for
it's creator's Trey Parker and Matt Stone and I'm a little surprised the film
didn't receive a NC-17 rating.  Their many targets include: The MPAA, the
military, Brooke Shields, The Baldwins and Bill Gates.  To top it off the movie
is a musical. However, the movie isn't flawless.  Some of the jokes fall flat,
especially the Saddam Hussein-Satan subplot, and it goes on too long and
although it's not boring the last 20 minutes don't match up with the first 60.
But, "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut" is still a worthy film.  I just hope
that kids not allowed in because of the "R" rating don't bribe homeless people
to buy them tickets.

Author
Jamie Peck
Rating: **1/2 (out of ****)
Paramount / 1:22 / 1999 / R (non-stop profanity and crude humor, comic
violence)
Cast: Trey Parker; Matt Stone; Mary Kay Bergman; Isaac Hayes
Director: Trey Parker
Screenplay: Trey Parker; Matt Stone; Pam Brady
Take a good gander at the title of "South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut."
If you don't spot the naughty joke immediately, perhaps you're not in
the movie's target audience. This double entendre fittingly serves a
double purpose, barely tapping the randy humor yet to come and heralding
exactly how this "Park" will differ from the version that's seen weekly
on Comedy Central in television-sized, half-hour and censored format.
At least give credit to co-creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone for being
honest from the get-go. Their movie's definitely "Bigger," the colorful
but crude construction paper-animation a nice change of pace on the
silver screen from cutting-edge 'toons like "Tarzan." It's certainly
"Longer," more than three times the length of an average episode. And
it's undeniably "Uncut": Just look and listen as a barrage of bawdy
behavior and imaginative profanity assault the senses of all in
attendance at this ode to obscenity and eventually the first amendment
and parental responsibility.
Hijinks as usual are in store for the South Park, Colorado gang of tubby
Cartman, Jewish Kyle, lovesick Stan and cryptic Kenny (voiced by either
Parker or Stone), only their misadventures here leave behind an
especially timely message. As real-life theatres stronghold their
policies regarding admittance into R-rated films following the
entertainment industry's blame in the Columbine tragedy, Park's fearsome
foursome sneak a peek at a not-for-kids flick called "A--es of Fire,"
starring filthy Canadian comics Terrance and Phillip. These
sewer-mouthed pranksters leave an indelible impression on our
protagonists, causing them to retreat back to the schoolyard with a
shocking new vocabulary.
This is where "South" began to head south for this non-fan who's caught
only bits and pieces of the boob-tube "Park." Being "Bigger" is a
necessity. But the "Longer & Uncut" parts create a TV-to-movie
transition that depreciates from roughly the 30-minute mark on, its
anything-goes offensiveness factor zapping most of the series' crass
charm. The novelty of cartoon kids swearing in proud, full glory (this
film's main reason for existing?) gets old fast, long before Kenny gets,
yes, killed and dispatched to hell, where he meets Satan and Saddam
Hussein - portrayed, of course, as homosexual lovers in a gruesomely
dysfunctional relationship, their bedroom ballistics pure overkill.
Kenny's death is "A--es of Fire"-related, literally and figuratively,
causing mothers everywhere to band together and point fingers at our
northern neighbors. We've seen this U.S-Canada skirmish before in
"Canadian Bacon," but not with a series of never-ending musical numbers.
That's right, "South Park" is a full-blown singalong, and it's worth
noting that the crowning moment - Satan's lamenting power ballad "Up
There" - contains nary a bad word, instead milking laughs by hilariously
mocking the hero showstoppers oft found in Disney fare. Broadway,
especially "Les Misérables," also gets roasted in the film's numerous
production numbers, which grow as stale as a month-old box of Cheesy
Poofs.
Sure, some of the excessive raunch flies, particularly an early Terrance
and Phillip ditty that includes a Riverdance performed by leaky rears
instead of tap shoes. But Parker and Stone almost always hit the mark
with nasty jabs at pop culture and celebrity image - ridiculing everyone
from the news media and Bill Gates (likely targets) to Conan O'Brien and
Jar Jar Binks (not) - and thus end up concocting quite an uneven display
of demented satire. "South Park" lovers won't be as picky or
discriminating, probably embracing the whole "Bigger, Longer & Uncut"
package. But I'll take smaller, shorter and bleeped any day.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"It presents as comedy things that are not amusing. If you think this
movie is funny, that tells me things about you I don't want to know."
-Roger Ebert on "Very Bad Things"

Author
Murali Krishnan
The logical progression, according to the dictates of the modern
American film industry, is to take a successful television series, and
capitalize on its fan base by releasing a feature film of that series.
"South Park" started as a short which was popular enough to prompt a
series on the Comedy Central television network, quickly becoming one
of that station's most popular series.
The appeal of the series lies in its contradictions. The animation is
rough and jerky, but the result is a minimalistic, almost avant-garde
quality. The children are drawn in an innately cute manner, with large
heads and large eyes, but their dialog and actions can be quite
vulgar. However the best quality of the series is the satire, which is
constantly skewering various aspect of American pop culture.
The four main characters are Stan, Kyle, Eric, and Kenny. They are
third grade students in the quiet town of South Park. One day they
sneak into an "R" rated film starring their favorite television
personalities, Terrance and Phillip. While most of the audience is
instantly turned off by the films excessive profanity and flatulence
based humor, the boys are riveted. When the impressionable boys mimic
the movie's vulgarities back in the classroom, the teachers and
parents are outraged. Kyle's mother takes an especially vociferous
role in determining how to protect their children from such bad
influences. A quick evaluation determines that because Terrance and
Phillip are Canadian, America must ban all things Canadian, as well as
execute Terrance and Phillip.
The undertone of the film is a clever self reference. Obviously this
film contains excessive profanity that the parents object to in the
Terrance and Phillip film. The point being made is the hypocrisy in
the allowable levels of objectionable content in mass media. Typically
in American film, profanity and sexual content are derided, but
violence is tolerated (although recent tragic events may have elevated
the objectionability violence). In reality, just as in this film,
there is no shortage of knee-jerk reactions (and an ambiguous
assignment of cause and effect) when discussing objectionable images
reflected in mass media.
An extra dimension is added to the story when it is revealed that the
impending execution of Terrance and Phillip is the event that will
unleash the Armageddon. Kenny is killed (just as in every television
episode) when he imitates a scene from Terrance and Phillip, and finds
his access denied into the sparsely populated heaven. When he enters
hell, he discovers that Satan is preparing to ascend to rule Earth
along with his lover, the recently deceased Saddam Hussein. Kenny
desperately tries to warn the other boys that the must rescue Terrance
and Phillip from death in order to save the world.
The strength of the film is its biting satire, which is often extreme.
Among the targets are American cultural imperialism, racial politics,
and fundamental Christian images of heaven and hell. One example is
the shocking image of Mahatma Gandhi welcoming Kenny to hell, which is
a commentary on the fundamentalist Christian view that Gandhi has met
the same fate in the afterlife as Adolf Hitler. Sensitive viewers may
feel that the film tries to be funny by simply being vulgar. Indeed,
the profanity is extreme and occasionally distracting, but often it is
a part of the deeper lampoon. Another dimension of the satire is the
multitude of musical productions. For viewers who dislike musicals,
these provide an enjoyable roasting of the usually wholesome genre.
Perhaps the best number is when Satan longingly sings of his desire to
rise and rule the Earth. The popular song from the television series
in which Eric derides Kyle's mother is also presented in the film.
Recommended. Viewers who enjoy the television series will probably
also like this film. It is definitely more vulgar, and at times the
obscenity becomes tiresome rather than funny. Viewers who are not
familiar with the television series can also enjoy this film, filled
with scathing satire and commentary about American pop culture. The
film is intentionally extreme in its profanity and sexual content, so
sensitive viewers will be offended. Although it is a cartoon, this
film is definitely not intended for children.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
WARNING: If you are easily offended by such things as poop jokes, fart
jokes, puke jokes, racism, sexism, anti-Semitism, homophobia, xenophobia,
kids swearing like drunken sailors at a whorehouse, real-looking dildos,
nudity, cartoon sex, violence, blood and gore, Saddam Hussein and Satan
doing the nasty, and most of all, musical numbers...then this film just
ain't your bag! Oh, and by the way, this is NOT for kids :)
PLOT:
The gang from South Park attempt to save two Canadian foul-mouthed comedians
who are set to be executed by the United States of America, after its
declaration of war on Canada. Unbeknownst to everyone except for the kids
(Their dead friend Kenny returned as a ghost to tell them this bit of news),
the successful execution will lead to the rise of Satan and Saddam Hussein
from hell, and to their domination of the world. Simple enough?
CRITIQUE:
This movie is rude, crude, racist, sexist, homophobic, cheesily animated,
and pretty much offensive in every which way that you could possibly
imagine...it's also fuckin' hilarious!!! Before I saw this film, I had never
really sat through an entire episode of the "South Park" TV show. Not
because I didn't want to or anything, I just don't watch a lot of
television. Now as much as this film is probably geared more towards the
true fans of the show, I was still able to enjoy all of its disgusting,
over-the-edge, offensive-to-everyone, humor. This movie is definitely made
for people who are NOT tied to any politically correct soapbox. In fact,
that was the one thing that I really dug about this comedy more than any of
the other THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY-type films that have been cropping up
of late. It didn't ease up near the end, or pretend to be emotional at any
point, or apologize for anything that it stood for. It was nasty, raunchy,
and just plain ol' American-Joe funny to me. No holds barred!
Being Canadian myself, I must say that I was probably a little biased by the
hilarious depiction of our country and its circumstances within the story.
"Canada...kill them before they kill us!", read one T-shirt in the movie.
Pretty funny. There were also a lot of "smaller jokes" which may slip you by
if you're not paying close attention (Listen closely near the end, when one
of the African-American soldiers sounds peculiarly like one Jar-Jar
character from THE PHANTOM MENACE...nice touch, guys!). The one thing that
might've been improved on in this film, is the matter of musical numbers
that scattered its length. Most of them were pretty funny, but they didn't
need to have every single character break out in song at some point of the
movie. Then again, it was a small price to pay for an overall enjoyable time
at the theatre of movies. Just make sure that you leave your "thinking cap"
home for this one, switch off all of your politically correct electrodes,
and get ready to be entertained by a bunch of immature kids with filthy
mouths, fucked-up thoughts and the balls to pull it all off. Of course I am
speaking of the two men behind this raunchy production: Trey Parker and Matt
Stone.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director/producer/writer Trey Parker's real name is Randolph Parker III. He
and friend Matt Stone have been slated to write the prequel to the movie
DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10) (Current working title is DUMB AND DUMBER: THE
EARLY YEARS). They're also in a band called DVDA. Matt is the drummer. The
band's name comes from the term Double Vaginal, Double Anal, which is
supposed to be the highest paying performance given by an actress in a porn
flick. Up until now, DVDA has produced three original songs, "I Am
Chewbacca", "Fuck That Guy From Bush", and "Now You're A Man", which is
included on the ORGAZMO film soundtrack. A film written and directed by Trey
Parker.
Some celebrity cameo voices in this film include George Clooney as the
doctor, Minnie Driver as Brooke Shields, Eric Idle as the scientist, and
Mike Judge.
Word on the street is that despite the title of this film, Matt Stone and
Trey Parker were forced by the MPAA to cut about 2 minutes of footage from
this film to bring it out of the NC-17 range and into an R rating. I guess
they're "almost" as nasty as they wanted to be. We'll have to wait for DVD
for the other stuff.

Author
David Peak
Not since Animal Farm has a story been so important to its time.  Not since
Animal Farm has a story used such intellectual satire.  In the way that Animal
Farm portrayed our governments, South Park portrays our current day society and
does it well.  The people that complain about south park are missing out in its
hidden messages of parenthood and childhood.
People may complain about the vulgarity of the senseless violence in South
Park. But you must admit, if they are complaining about the movie then they
have obviously noticed it.  Maybe even seen it.  There are some movies that
need to be seen twice, once just to see and twice to analyse, this is one of
those movies.  This movie gets another thing straight too, kids aren't these
sweet angels that they seem to be, deep inside even the nicest kid is a bastard
lurking to come out, this movies jus has the guts to say so.
I applaud Trey Parker and Matt Stone for making this movie.  So what if you
don't think its funny, then don't see it.  If your offended, then don't take it
so seriously.  Every once in a while we need an alternative to seriousness and
this movies gives us one.  It allows us to laugh guilt free at some of the most
controversial topics in our modern society.  If you've read this far in my
review than I thank you for listening to me and I hope that you agree with me. 
I definately reccommend watching South Park at least once, there hasn't been
anything this funny in a long time.

Author
Eugene Novikov
South Park: Bigger Longer and Uncut (1999)
Reviewed by Eugene Novikov
http://www.ultimate-movie.com
Member: Online Film Critics Society
"Remember what the MPAA says: Horrific and deplorable violence is ok as
long as you don't say any naughty words."
Featuring the voice talents of Matt Stone, Trey Parker, Mary Kay
Bergman. Rated R.
Filmmakers jump on real-life controversies faster than Austin Powers on
Felicity Shagwell. The debate on whether cinema is to blame for
teenagers turning into hoodlums has only begun to heat up, and already
someone's made a movie about it, and it's not, thank God, a tragic
account of a family ripped apart by the effect violence in films had on
a teenage boy. Instead we get a sharp, biting satire that takes no
prisoners and leaves no conservative point of view unscathed.
Based on a popular (and controversial) cable tv show, South Park: Bigger
Longer and Uncut can finally break loose of the shackles placed on the
show by television restrictions and take bad taste to brand new heights.
The movie is about a group of kids who sneak into a Canadian R-rated
movie and learn some naughty words. When they exhibit their new
knowledge to their moms, they decide to "blame Canada," wage war against
the neighbor country and execute "Terrence and Phillip," the flatulent
actors in the obscene film. The kids form an alliance they name "La
Resistance" (with the accent on the third syllable of "Resistance") to
save their favorite thespians, in a hilarious spoof of (tribute to?) Les
Misérables.
In a subplot, one of the characters (Kenny, who else?) dies and goes to
hell where he meets Satan. Satan and Saddam Hussein are lovers, you see.
Satan is a benevolent soul, while our favorite Eastern ruler can only
think about sex. Apparently, too, if Terrence and Phillip are executed
it will be the final sign of the apocalypse and Satan can emerge from
the deepest bowels of the Underground Kingdom to rule the Earth.
Aside from being a brilliant satire, South Park is also an all-stops-out
musical, with unforgettable numbers like "Shut Your F***ing Face Uncle
F***er" and "Cartman's Mom is a Big Fat Bitch". Almost invariably it's
funny stuff: often juvenile but always funny. The same can be said for
the rest of the movie: it's intelligent but delivered in a sophomoric
manner (i.e. toilet humor, endless profanity, etc.). Not that there's
anything wrong with that: vulgarity, when done right, is my bag, baby.
Trey Parker and Matt Stone, the twenty-somethings behind the film and
the show, paint a bulls-eye on The Motion Picture Association of America
and proceed to be the first to start trying to hit it. Cruelly mocking
the fact that the MPAA's rating system will allegedly tolerate grotesque
violence as long as obscenities aren't uttered, the auteurs throw some
nasty one-liner insults their way. The ratings-a-plenty association
isn't the only target of this unsparing banter: people who favor
censoring movies over gun control are equally fair game, with the "Blame
Canada" plot being a not-so-cheap shot at them.
The distinctively low-tech "cardboard" animation is oddly effective,
even more so than the state of the art "Deep Canvas" technique aptly
demonstrated in the recent Tarzan. It's more pleasant to look at, less
intimidating up on the screen, and most importantly it doesn't detract
from the film's concept as much as Disney's admirably awe-inspiring work
does.
The show's popularity has been waning as of late, and perhaps this movie
is just the thing to boost its ratings. Perhaps not. Having seen the
show on numerous occasions, I can say that it's not nearly as smart or
as funny as this movie. The series may be better off simply continuing
on the big screen every couple years. Parker and Stone have outdone
themselves to the point where I am forced to ask: Must the show go on?
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Jon Ridge
" Southpark: Bigger, Longer, Uncut "  * * *
    Before it runs out of steam toward the end, SOUTHPARK (which
incidentally was cut to secure an R-rating) is the funniest film of the
year.  By default; there havenšt been many comedies, and certainly none this
unabashedly obscene.  And, right from the start, you know youšre in the
hands of a couple filmmakers with a keen sense of humor, as Kyle, Stan,
Cartman and Kenny head off to "a foreign film from Canada", via an hilarious
Disney rip-off show tune called "Mountain Town".  Iconoclasm in place;
politics are next.  The kids canšt get into the new Terrance and Phillip
film, because it is R-rated (for good reason) and theyšre underage.  Tip, if
you find yourself in a similar predicament:  bribe the local bum, and no
movie or ratings restriction is unbeatable.  Good thing they get in, too, as
the incessantly profane five minutes we see next are a riot, full of as many
fart noises and Fš words as Išve seen in that short a time.  Then comes the
hook:  Comedy Central canšt run "Southpark" in all its glory.  So, once the
boys leave their three-hour marathon of more bad language than they know
what to do with, BIGGER, LONGER, is caution-to-the-wind cursing.  Not more
than a lot of other R-rated films from, say, Martin Scorcese ­ like most
people seem to be obsessing about ­ mind you.  But, still; the creativity
with which these small fries spout about is, ah, a might off-setting.
Which takes only a few minutes to desensitize us to what wešre hearing;
I mean, really, you hear ten mutterings of "pig-fucker" or "shit-smeller" (I
may be a little inaccurate with those examples, but you get it), and youšve
heard a lifetime.  So, just being crude wouldnšt be enough.  No, series
creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone are not ones to rest on their
considerable laurels, and thus, this SOUTHPARK feature goes a step or two
further with a clever storyline:  the parents of our four young anti-heroes
are shocked by their newfound vocabulary.  A scapegoat is needed, but whom.
Canadians, of course.  War is declared, Terrance and Phillip are taken
hostage and their public execution planned out, and Cartman ­ following his
humorous ditty, "Kylešs Momšs a Bitch", sung by members of several different
nationalities ­ gets a chip put in his head that prevents further use of
foul language through shock treatment.  In the meantime, Kenny suffers his
usual death, goes to hell, where Satan and Sadam Hussein are lovers, and
Satan is a big softie and wants to be able to communicate with his partner
instead of just having sex all the time.  But, nevermind.
SOUTHPARK is entertaining, on top of being sleazy, and that is to be
commended.  Because it didnšt have to be as good as it is, and who knew.
There are a few scratch that, way too many songs (some funny, some blah),
and thatšs why I say the film wears out its welcome.  Before that happens,
though, chances are you wonšt laugh more during any other movie this summer
than you will, here.
Highlights:  Winona Ryderšs performance with a ping-pong ball; the
untimely murder of Bill Gates; that "Uncle Fucker" song from ASSES OF FIRE
(oh.. my.. god); Cartmanšs improvisational use of his neural implant, to
save the day.  And, needless to say, getting to see the true face of Kenny;
canšt beat that.      

Author
Luke Buckmaster
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT
Featuring the voices of: Trey Parker and Matt Stone
Director: Trey Parker
Screenplay: Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut is exactly what concerned parents
have feared that television and film would produce.  It is insulting,
dirty, sexist, racist and obnoxious; it's unapologetic and in your face.
Yet millions will flock to see the film, and most of them - myself
included - laugh at the sight of Saddam Huessein holding a fake penis,
trying to entertain the devil who is, at the time, lying in bed next to
him.  Perhaps it's reassuring to know that whilst there are plenty of
warped minds in the world, there are also the minds of Trey Parker and
Matt Stone, who have taken their cult TV show to the next step of
popularity and censorship tolerance.
'Longer and 'uncut' are appropriate words considering the trouble that
Parker, the director, has gone to, to ensure that his film performs on a
level that perhaps the television show - which looks tame in
comparison - always aspired to.  The good news for all you South Park
fanatics is that the movie, which is by no means a cult classic or a
must see, delivers the jokes and delivers them well.  Which is
convenient, because this film has more profanities than Eddy Murphy on
ecstasy, and for unsuspecting viewers will be more off-putting than Mal
Colston on a bad hair day.
Our four unlikely heroes are Kyle, Stan, Cartman and Kenny, four young
kinds growing up in a small American town.  Trouble begins when the boys
attend a screening of  "The 'Terrence and Philip Movie," which I will
simply explain as a continuous collection of swearing and fart jokes.
Sure enough, these impressionable kids soon scream all kinds of
profanities around town, and all the other children join in.  Before you
know it, teachers at school are teaching how not to swear, and many of
the town's parents - including Cartman's mum (Mary Kay Bergman), who is
described "a dirty slut" - search for whom to blame.  After a catchy
music track titled "Blame Canada," the US does exactly that and war is
declared. Meanwhile, Saddam Huessein and his boyfriend, Lucifer, plot to
take over the world.
South Park is laced with cynicism and sarcasm at every corner, and in
that regard, it's not the piece of trash that some may have believed it
to be.  Yes, there is a little depth in South Park, even though you
might have to dig down deep to find it.  It's this film's humor that
makes it an appealing piece of modern television culture, produced in an
era where animated programs can carry just as much weight as any others.
Many of these shows rely on flowing dialogue rather than impressive
animation, and comical impersonations rather than profound political
insights.  South Park certainly doesn't rely on its animation - most of
which could easily have been made twenty years ago - so it's the film's
darkly humorous dialogue that gives it its edge.  If Parker and Stone
have proved anything, it's that there is nowhere they will not go, and
no gag they not will implement - regardless of how cheap the joke might
be.
Strangely enough, South Park is appealing as an eighty-minute collection
of gags and silly songs.  I found the film to be ten times more
satisfying and entertaining than one of its television episodes, and a
thoroughly amusing comedy if accepted on its own merits.  Thank heavens
that South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut amused me.  It could have been
accused of openly contaminating the minds of children, if Cartman didn't
say it first: "this movie has warped my fragile little mind."
 ----------------------------------------------
Review Š copyright Luke Buckmaster

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **1/2 (out of 4 = okay/average)
1999, R, 83 minutes [1 hour, 23 minutes]
Starring the voices of: Trey Parker (Eric Cartman, Stan Marsh, Mr. Garrison, 
Officer Barbrady, various others), Matt Stone (Kyle Brosloski, Kenny 
McCormick, Pip, Uncle Jimbo Marsh, various others), Mary Kay Bergman (Mrs. 
Brosloski, Ms. Cartman, Mrs. Marsh, Mrs. McCormick, Wendy Testaburger, 
various others), Isaac Hayes (Chef); written by Pam Brady, Trey Parker, Matt 
Stone; produced by Trey Parker, Matt Stone; directed by Trey Parker; based on 
the television series `South Park' created by Trey Parker and Matt Stone.
Seen July 1, 1999 at 5:10 p.m. at the Crossgates Cinema 18 (Guilderland, NY), 
theater #17, by myself for free using my Hoyts season pass. [Theater rating: 
****: excellent sound, picture and seats]
        Us critics have complained for years about artistic expression being 
suppressed by the suits in Hollywood. How dare some corporate goon interfere 
in the creative process just to make a few more dollars? But in the case of 
`South Park: Bigger, Longer And Uncut,' there doesn't seem to be any signs of 
any higher powers meddling with two GenXers beloved creation, which probably 
would have helped since the result plays more like a big spit in the eye of 
authority than any kind of zinging satire. What else do you expect when you 
let kids loose in the candy shop?
        Just to lay down a quick disclaimer here, `South Park' is an 
animated, adult-oriented comedy series on Comedy Central which consistently 
pushes the envelope of what is acceptable comedy for a mainstream audience. 
The jokes are raunchy, racist, disgusting and just plain cruel, but creators 
Trey Parker and Matt Stone aren't really out to offend any people or groups 
of people, just the powers that be. Watching it (and this film), you get the 
feeling that they are rebels at heart and instead of blowing up government 
buildings they redirect their hostility through their comedy about four 
children living and growing up in the seemingly ordinary, quiet town of South 
Park, Colorado.
        In fact, this is how the film begins, with a cute little song and 
dance routine performed by our four little scamps: Stan Marsh, Eric Cartman, 
Kyle Brosloski and Kenny McCormick (voiced by Parker and Stone among dozens 
of other characters). This opening routine works well to establish the fact 
that everything to do with `South Park' is a ripping, biting satire of some 
aspect of society or at least how we'd like to think of society as being. The 
four children are all in third grade and each has their own niche: Eric is 
the funny-talking, ill-tempered fat kid who everyone else makes fun of and 
just refers to as `Cartman;' Kyle is the Jewish kid whose mother (voiced by 
Bergman among other voices) feels the need to be the town watchdog on 
everything; Kenny is repressed son of white trash who is always tagging 
behind and can barely speak because his parka is pulled over his face (he 
always suffers a cruel death in each episode of the show); and Stan is the 
most normal of the group whose big characteristic is his nervousness around 
his crush, Wendy Testaburger (who he repeatedly vomits on).
        Of course most of these characteristics we're supposed to know going 
into the movie since Parker and Stone want to waste no time in establishing 
an easy plot and getting to the verbal kicking in the groin of the 
establishment. This is accomplished when Cartman, Kyle, Stan and Kenny manage 
to get into a movie featuring their favorite comedians, Terrance and Phillip 
(also regulars of the television series who have their own show within the 
show, which is 99 percent fart jokes and other lowbrow and low-blow jokes). 
The movie the four boys see is loaded with extreme vulgarity in which T&P 
sing songs about incest, bestiality and scatological topics (and this is 
putting it VERY mildly). As the two utter every possible profane term in the 
English language in a carefree, non-apologetic way, we're shown the 
expressions on the four boys' faces of delight and shock, which is probably 
what most people in the real audience will experience too. 
        By the time the first 20 minutes of the film have passed, more 
obscenities have been tossed around by the four than most three-hour Scorcese 
or Coppola flicks do in their entire running time. What's more, the film 
doesn't back down from there. It's just hit us with a sucker punch and then 
shows no mercy. Much like the show, the four boys throw around the vulgarity 
at each other as if the words were as common as `the' and `to.' How the film 
escaped an NC-17 rating just for its first act alone is a mystery.
        Watching the film continue to unwind its story and press on with its 
dialogue you quickly become completely desensitized to the extreme blackness 
of the comedy going on (either that or you'll probably walk out as everyone 
else but the four boys do at the Terrance and Phillip movie). But this is 
where the film loses touch of what makes the television show work - the fact 
there are no limits. Because of FCC regulations (and, I assume, Comedy 
Central's own standards), the show has to come up with original ways to be 
offensive, shocking and funny without just using blatant vulgarity for 
vulgarity's sake. I mean, it's much funnier to hear the boys call each other 
names like `ass master' rather than `_____(fill in the blank with anything 
utilizing the `S' or `F' words among others).' Name-calling is a staple form 
of comedy, but it's also generic, primitive and quickly becomes stale.
        The actual plot of the movie eventually kicks in when Mrs. Broslowski 
overhears the boys talking trash and organizes a massive group of concerned 
parents of South Park to blame Canada for warping their childrens' minds 
(because Terrance and Phillip are Canadians). There's even a full 
song-and-dance routine lead by Mrs. B and the fellow MAC (Mothers Against 
Canada) members to get the USA to declare war on our northern neighbor and 
execute Terrance and Phillip as war criminals.
        Sound a little zany and extreme? Of course, but that's the whole 
point of `South Park' the series and this film. And ideally this is funny and 
often makes way for some good belly laughs, but there just isn't much more 
depth to the satire here than just silliness. For example, the film regularly 
includes send-ups of Disney animated children's film with its little musical 
ditties, but they become tiring and boring when we get one every five or ten 
minutes. Also, a subplot in which Saddam Hussein has become Satan's gay lover 
is milked to death by Parker and Stone who must think all Americans think of 
Saddam in the same vein as Hitler, but I think most of us just don't know 
enough about the guy to care. Portraying Satan as a big teddy bear underneath 
his facade of evil doesn't do much either, it's just lame.
        There's a piece of dialogue spoken late `South Park: Bigger, Longer 
And Uncut' which states aloud the point Parker and Stone want to convey with 
their masturbatory masterpiece. In reference to Terrance and Phillip's 
R-rated film, a reporter covering a bloody war between the United States and 
Canada says something to the effect of, `It doesn't matter if it's loaded 
with violence, as long as there's no foul language the MPAA says it's safe 
for children.' 
---------------------------------
Please visit Chad'z 
Movie Page
 - over 220 new and old movies reviewed in-depth, not just blind ratings 
and blather capsules.
Member of The O.F.C.S. (Online Film 
Critics Society)

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes, George Clooney, 
Minnie Driver, Dave Foley, Mike Judge, Eric Idle, Brent Spiner. Music by 
Marc Shaiman. Screenplay by Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady. 
Directed by Trey Parker. 82 minutes.
Rated R, 3.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
"Off to the movies we shall go,
Where we learn everything that we know,
'Cause the movies teach us what our parents don't have time to say."
from "Mountain Song," written by Trey Parker and Marc Shaiman
So begins the animated musical "South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut," 
which starts off strong, sags quite a bit in the middle, but comes back 
for a rousing finale. The big-screen version of the popular TV series is 
staggeringly profane and very funny, although it may prove troublesome to 
those gentle souls offended by non-stop swearing, bathroom humor, 
sacrilegious remarks and jokes about "family values," small town 
Americana, Heaven, Hell, the movie ratings system, racism, abortion, 
menstruation, rednecks, gays, Christians, Jews, Canadians, doctors, 
homeless people, fat people, the military, the Presidency, Saddam Hussein,
 Bryan Adams, Anne Murray, Celine Dion, Alanis Morissette, Winona Ryder, 
Brooke Shields, the Baldwin Brothers, Bill Gates and Jar Jar Binks. Give 
creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone credit, though: they treat Olympic 
skater Brian Boitano with the utmost of respect.
A word of warning to parents: Even if you allow your children to watch 
"South Park" on TV, do not let them see this movie without first 
screening it yourself. "Bigger, Longer and Uncut" is a comedy for adults 
that takes full advantage of its "R" rating. 
In fact, parents who fail to adequately monitor their children are key to 
the film's plot. After eight-year-old twerps Stan Marsh, Kenny McCormick, 
Kyle Broflovski and Eric Cartman take in a screening of "Asses of Fire," 
an R-rated movie starring their favorite TV stars, Canadian comics 
Terrance and Phillip, they emerge from the theater with a broader 
vocabulary, courtesy of their newly uncensored heroes. When the children 
of the sleepy little Colorado town of South Park begin swearing like 
longshoremen, their parents wildly overreact, leading to the United 
States declaring war on Canada. 
As happens weekly on the TV version of "South Park," Kenny dies horribly, 
only this time we follow him into the afterlife. Rejected from Heaven, 
Kenny plummets to Hell, where he overhears a conversation between Satan 
and his lover, Saddam Hussein. To save the world, Kenny must return to 
Earth and somehow prevent the pending execution of Terrance and Phillip.  
While the animation for the big screen "South Park" remains as 
delightfully crude as the original, co-writers Parker, Stone and Pam 
Brady use their new forum to create a lavish send-up of animated musicals.
 The 12 songs lampoon everything from Broadway style show stoppers to 
cheesy power ballads. Highlights include "Uncle Fucka," an obscenity-fest 
from Terrance and Phillip, "Blame Canada," a brassy offering from the 
parents, the peppy "Kyle's Mom's A Bitch" and "Up There," a terrifically 
hokey "inspirational" number from Satan himself, complete with the Dark 
Lord breaking into a falsetto during the overwrought climax, as a choir 
swells behind him. 
The songs, with lyrics by Parker and music by Marc Shaiman, are hilarious 
dead-on parodies, but for a film only 82 minutes long, a dozen tunes are 
a bit much (although I can't imagine cutting even one of these nasty 
little ditties). Surprisingly, Chef (Isaac Hayes), the one character who 
routinely croons on the TV series, doesn't sing a note here. 
After a powerhouse beginning, "Bigger, Longer and Uncut" suffers from a 
flaccid midsection. The boys organize "La Resistance," a children's 
crusade to rescue Terrance and Phillip, while Kenny counsels Satan about 
his codependent relationship with Saddam Hussein. Both storylines are 
sporadically amusing, but fail to sustain the riotous tone established 
earlier in the film. Thankfully, everything builds to an ending that 
almost recaptures the energy level of the opening. And, as an added treat,
 fans get to clearly see and hear little Kenny for the first time.
At once a scattershot satire and a feature-length dirty joke, "South 
Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut" is a hoot, a spirited, invigorating 
exercise in tastelessness. Some fans will bemoan the musical format, 
while social observers will likely wail that the film is another example 
of how far our culture has fallen. To both groups, I can only quote the 
immortal words of Eric Cartman: "Screw you guys, I'm going home."

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
OK, I'm finally getting around to write about this movie, which I saw
this past weekend.  From a business point of view, it's a little
disappointing that the show wasn't sold out.  I suppose that simply
reflects how South Park has a certain audience, and this audience has
probably gone and seen it on opening weekend, and not the subsequent
weekend like me.
The film is truly epic.  Most TV shows that go on to become films have
a problem expanding out of their 30-minute time slots into something
larger, leaving numerous soft spots.  Witness the Beavis and Butthead
movie, any number of Saturday Night Live derived films, the revivals of
certain series from the 1970s.  "South Park" succeeds where others have
failed: not only does it make the transition from small screen to big,
it does it in grand, brilliant fashion, spanning the universe from the
deepest pits of Hell to the, uh, celestial spheres of heaven.  It's
funny throughout: the number of minutes you spend not chuckling or
laughing out loud can be counted on your fingers.  Granted, this is
mostly gross out humor and the amusement of seeing third graders curse
floridly, and it's just damn funny.  Yes, we've known all along that
South Park is a raw-for-TV show with a even more raw R-rated movie
inside waiting to break out, but seeing Cartman let loose, a sort of
apotheosis of Eric, is a wonder in itself.  It's what we've been
waiting for.
"South Park" even has a point to make, particularly relevant after the
Littleton, CO, shootings, where everything remotely connected to the
media or computer gaming industry was blamed for the violence of two
disturbed individuals.  This is not a simple, potty-mouthed movie, but
a sharp bit of social commentary as well.  A stand is taken, and I
leave it to the movie to make its argument.
One nice thing about this transition from small to big screen is that
they don't try to drag out every peripheral character that's ever been
on the show.  Yes, Damien Son of Satan is in the background, as is
Jesus and, I think, Pip, but they have no speaking roles.  It's like
any other SP episode where they have to show a crowd shot: the whole
town's there, but no talking.  I winced a few times during, say, one of
the Star Trek movies where Ensign Bob who appeared in a few episodes
back in season 5 and 6 had to get his two lines in.  When a TV series
makes it to film, it generally tries to hard to be golly gee about the
whole thing.  SP doesn't.
Not that there aren't references to South Parks Past and the other
epics of the Parker/Stone ouvre.  Kenny dies in the hospital after
having a baked potato put in his chest, an apparent reference to the
main song [1] of "Cannibal: The Musical" [2].  And the whole Brian
Boitano thing is baffling only if you haven't seen the animated short
that started it all, "The Spirit of Christmas" [3].
For that matter, one of the things little remarked upon about this
movie is the fact that it's a musical, complete with sophisticated
production numbers and a wonderful part towards the end when the main
songs of the movie are interwoven into a four-way medley.  Broadway
shows are parodied -- Les Mis was skewered -- as well as Disney
animated films -- Satan as the Little Mermaid.  This shouldn't be
surprising giving the large musical content of the weekly show, as well
as previous Parker-Stone efforts like "Cannibal" (all singing, all
dancing, all flesh-eating).
So, how would Brian Boitano end this review?
[1] http://www.wedgieworld.com/cannibal/shpadoinkle2.html
[2] http://us.imdb.com/Reviews/167/16750
[3] http://us.imdb.com/Title?0122264

Author
Michael Dequina
_South_Park:_Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_ (R) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
The notoriously naughty youngsters of controversial animated
_South_Park_ have hit the big screen, and if you're a living, breathing,
flesh-and-blood human being, chances are that there will be at least one
thing about this _Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_ adventure that you will find
completely, totally offensive.  No one is safe: women, Jews, blacks,
gays, Canadians--not even fans of the series itself are free from
co-creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone's all-encompassing satirical net. 
Not even non-fans such as myself can escape, for this relentless,
envelope-obliterating comedy is, quite simply, one of the sharpest and
funniest films one is likely to see in this or any other year.
The _South_Park_ series never had more than a negligible novelty value
for me; after 15 minutes, not only did the TV-MA crudity of the language
and subject matter get old, but so did the restrictions of being on basic
cable.  To me, Parker and Stone always seemed to be on to something but
were never quite allowed to get there; though they operated under more
relaxed standards at Comedy Central, those were standards nonetheless. 
In the R-rated arena of the big screen, all bets are off, and Parker and
Stone take full advantage of the freedom to take aim at everyone and
everything, in any way they see _un_fit.
So it should come as no surprise that their long list of mercilessly
skewered targets includes, among others, the aforementioned groups as
well as figures such as the Baldwin brothers, Bill Gates, Barbra
Streisand, and--to the delight of many an audience member--Jar Jar Binks.
 What is surprising is, though, is that perhaps their most prominent
target is themselves.  In a refreshing, smartly self-referential twist,
_Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_'s plot revolves around the effect that an
R-rated animated feature has on the familiar four of Stan Marsh, Kyle
Broflovski, Eric Cartman, and the perpetually ill-fated Kenny McCormick
(all voiced by either Parker or Stone), as well as the rest of the young
population of South Park.  With all the gradeschoolers now cursing
bluestreaks around family and foulmouthed friends, Kyle's mom (Mary Kay
Bergman) decides to take drastic action, setting off an outrageous chain
of events that comes to involve Saddam Hussein and his bedfellow--in
_every_ sense of the word--Satan himself.
To run through many more of those burned along Parker and Stone's
gleefully politically incorrect way would not only be pointless and
boring, but it also would spoil too many of the film's stinging jokes. 
But one target worth mentioning is the reigning king of animated
features, Disney.  _Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_ is just as much a satire of
the Mouse's sacred animated musical Formula as it is _South_Park_ itself.
 Stan's opening number is an affectionate, if very tongue-in-cheek,
send-up of _Beauty_and_the_Beast_'s classic curtain-raiser "Belle"; there
is even an earnest, heart-tugging "I Want" power ballad.  Parker's
uniquely absurdist twist on the latter is that the tune is soulfully
crooned by Satan.  There is more to Parker and Mark Shaiman's (who
composed the instrumental score) songs than just witty context and
bitingly hilarious lyrics; the melodies are genuinely infectious. 
Impossible though it may seen, a song bearing the says-it-all title
"Uncle Fucka" is just as memorable for its toe-tapping tune as it is its
proudly profane lyrics.  (OK, maybe not _as_ memorable, but the catchy
melody also lingers long in the mind.)
_South_Park:_Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_ will undoubtedly draw the ire of
many a political group as being a sterling example of the "impure" state
of popular entertainment today.  Is the film inappropriate for children? 
YES; they don't come much more adults-only than this one.  Is it
offensive?  Indeed it is.  But peel away the profuse profanity and
go-for-broke comic abandon, and the film ironically reveals a message as
wholesome and constructive as any G-rated film could offer: take
responsibilty for your children, in what they do and in especially what
they watch--certain films are designated as being for adults for a
reason.  The even greater irony is that a lot of parents looking for a
film "for the family" are certain to pay less attention to
_Bigger,_Longer_&_Uncut_'s R rating than to the fact that it is "a
cartoon."
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com


Author
David Wilcock
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut.
Starring the voices of Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Mary Kay Bergman
Directed by Trey Parker
Running Time: 1 hour 21 minutes
It's been a rather abysmal summer so far, with The Phantom Menace and Wild
Wild West being drab disappointments, and Austin Powers 2 only offering a
few true laughs. However, this new movie based on the hit television series
is good fun, and although lags in some parts, is outrageous enough to make
the 80 minutes running time fly by.
The film centres on four kids of South Park: Kyle, Stan, Cartman and Kenny.
They go see the new Terrence and Phillipe movie, Asses of Fire, which
happens to be full of swearing (and the entertaining song 'Uncle F*cka.) The
kids cotton on to the vulgarity, and their parents and teachers are shocked
by the words that come out of their mouths. The parents blame Canada, where
Asses of Fire was filmed, as to the cause of warping the kids, and America
declare war on the Canadians. They also demand that Terrence and Phillippe
are executed. In another subplot, if Terrence and Phillippe are killed,
Satan and his lover Saddam Hussein will rise again to walk the earth.
The plot is obviously a jab at the MPAA and parts of American society, who
believe that kids hearing stuff on the screen will automatically copy what
they hear. The irony is, of course, that many kids will sneak into this
film, and parents will be worried that they will copy the contents. But
while the film at first makes a satirical comment on society today, (e.g
violence is O.K but swearing is bad) it soon loses it way and becomes bought
up in a silly rescue plot that lacks all the bite featured before. The
satire is also a little broad and lazy, and never makes any biting comment.
But satire isn't the reason audiences are going to see this film: they are
going to see it for vulgarity and filth.
And South Park delivers in spades. While the television series has to be
toned down to be able to be broadcast, the film gets away with a lot more.
There's swearing every few seconds, and while rather funny at first, it soon
becomes a bit irritable. The film realises this, and incorporates some more
less swear based jokes, which is good and keeps the film going. There's
stabs at all types of groups: Christians, gays and the army. Even Bill Gates
gets a mention, and there's a funny stab at the new Star Wars movie.
A new addition to the standard South Park formula is the songs. Written by
Stone and Parker, there are largely catchy, but not particularly humorous.
Some of them are a little unnecessary, and the film seems a little unsure on
how to finish them off (it just cuts to the next scene.) The voices are
actually rather good though, and can keep a good tune.
The standard South Park animation remains (the film makes a joke about this)
although there's some interesting animation in the Hell sequences. The
animation being sub standard doesn't detract from the film in any way. And
although South Park is out to shock, it never seems forced or desperate to
make the audience shocked. It's never truly tasteless either.
With the various spoofs scattered here and there, the constant stream of
decent (if smutty) jokes, and listenable songs, the South Park movie is
actually very watchable, if undemanding. Far better than the second series
of the television show, South Park is a funny movie with a suitably short
running time so the attention doesn't wane. It's not perfect, and the
'satire' is a little heavy handed, but I recommend South Park to anyone
looking for a filthy good time.

Author
Greg King
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Trey Parker
Stars: voices of Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes, 
George Clooney, Minnie 
Driver, Brent Spiner, Eric Idle, Dave Foley, Mike Judge, Stewart 
Copeland, Jennifer Howell
Running time: 80 minutes.
With this feature length version of the cult animated series
South Park, creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone have deliberately
pushed the envelope.  Although aimed at adult audiences, South Park
has developed a strong following among younger audiences, much to the
horror of parents and cultural experts.  The animation definitely
lacks sophistication, but Parker and Stone more than make up for their
simplistic style with their razor sharp wit and wickedly off beat and
profane sense of humour.
The pair also possess an iconoclastic sense of humour.  In
this energetic and irreverent farce they target a number of familiar
figures, including America's premier acting family the Baldwins,
Winona Ryder, talk show host Conan O'Brien, and billionaire computer
geek Bill Gates.  A heavyweight cast, including George Clooney, Minnie
Driver, Brent Spiner and Eric Idle, also lend their vocal talents to
the film.
The film's defiantly politically incorrect humour is laced
with obvious racist and homophobic overtones.  However, despite its
subversive nature, South Park also resonates with positive messages
about tolerance, understanding and family values.  South Park
highlights the hypocrisy and dichotomy of American movie censorship,
in which massive violence and wanton destruction are okay, but sex and
profanity are a definite no-no.
When the fragile little minds of the children of this sleepy
Colorado mining town are endangered by an adult movie starring cult
heroes Terrance and Philip, South Park is in an uproar.  The disturbed
mothers unite to save their sons' morals and launch a campaign to
blame Canada.  Cartman is even implanted with an electronic chip that
sends out an electrical charge whenever he swears.  However,
censorship and censure soon leads to war between the US and Canada.
Meanwhile, Saddam Hussein and the devil, who are depicted in a cosy
relationship in hell, eagerly await their chance to dominated the
world.  Eventually, common sense prevails and peace returns to this
sleepy little mountain community.
South Park: Bigger, Longer And Uncut also features a number of
superb musical numbers, which is an obvious departure from the tv
series.  This can only be interpreted as a deliberate move by the
creators to send up those quaint and wholesome Disney movies so
admired by the previous generation.  The movie begins innocently
enough with a simple song that seemingly sings the praises of life in
this small mountain town, but it quickly reveals its darker intent.
The film features a number of decidedly catchy tunes that will help
sell soundtrack CDs by the truckload, even if their lyrics ensure they
won't receive commercial airplay.
South Park: Bigger, Longer And Uncut certainly crams plenty
into its brisk 80 minutes.  However, this hugely entertaining but
ribald film never outstays its welcome.  Even those unacquainted with
the popular series will find a lot to enjoy in this hilarious feature
length version.

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
Heavy Metal shocked us by having nude, animated people frolic on-screen, (as
did Fantastic Planet, etc) which is to say it was a cartoon for grown-ups.
Or, to look at it another way, the cartoon grew up with its initial
audience, that is, the audience grew up to make their own cartoon. But, in
spite of the casual drug use and the graphically-inked skin, Heavy Metal was
still pretty simple. Next, enter Japanimation, an artform unto itself,
which, with feature-length movies like Grave of the Fireflies and Akira,
introduced some much-needed narrative complexity into these 'cartoons,'
which, in spite of Disney's singalong efforts, were quickly becoming a
viable medium for presenting meaningful stories. The trailer for Happiness,
after all--a, somber, 'serious,' adult movie if there ever was one--was
animated. And what are The Simpsons about if not a level of social critique
most children aren't really interested in? In light of all this, it would
seem that Trey Parker and Matt Stone's South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut,
with its host of musical numbers, poor animation, and profanity that might
make Richard Pryor blush--not to mention its 'fad' status and T-shirt
sales--would be something of a throwback, atavistic by current anime
standards. In spite of itself, though, it's not.
It actually has quite a complex little rhetoric smuggled in under all the
self-effacement. The story is simple: the South Park gang we know and love
from Comedy Central manages to sneak into an R-rated movie, which instantly
corrupts their vocabulary, which in turn attracts the ire of the
PTA-contingent, who directs their collective anger at the Canadian
moviemakers, which--as everything escalates at light speed (i.e., faster
than logic)--results soon enough in America declaring war on Canada (and
nearly allows Satan and Sadam Hussein to take over the world, which 'dead'
Kenny gleans on his tour through Hell, but that's another story). All of
which serves to show not how important the profanity in the movie (Asses of
Fire) actually is, but how important we can make it, should we choose. And
of course it's all self-reflexive, which is where the complexity comes into
play: the movie-in-the movie--Asses of Fire--is a hardly-veiled version of
South Park (Bigger, Longer, & Uncut), which in turn suggests that when all
the profanity begins to offend us, as it's programmed to, we can either get
riled in the manner of South Park's PTA-contingent or simply sit back, let
the profanity etc wash over us.
Granted, at some level this is the same choice you have with any 'offensive'
movie, but South Park takes it one step further: by drawing the
PTA-contingent as so comically misdirected and hypocritical, their response
is thus pre-coded for us as 'wrong,' ridiculous, overblown. Meaning it
anticipates our eventual criticism and deconstructs it, leaves us no real
choice but to sit back and try to enjoy. Of course the oft-cited problem
with this metafictional approach is that, since the work is responding
solely to itself, it's solipsistic, onanistic--so self-involved as to be
void of any meaning, where meaning is defined as 'having some objective
correlation to the world.' The thing is, though, in spite of its narrative
self-involvement, the caricatures South Park draws, however harsh, are
nevertheless accurate. If you can't appreciate that, then look around, you
may just be on the PTA side of the river.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Robert Workman
The Happy Bastard's Quick Movie Review
Any movie that has a musical number that goes "Shut your f***ing face,
uncle f***er" can't be all bad, right?
Unlike most TV-show-to-movie translations, South Park: Bigger Longer &
Uncut shows an incredible urgency as it arrives on the big screen,
offering the same old visuals and the same old setting, but introducing
energetic dialogue (complete with profanity) and musical numbers that
really stand out from the usual disgusting comedy scene.  Trey Parker
and Matt Stone are commended for not standing down to the viciousness of
the MPAA.
The story's rather ironic, considering it's likely to happen in real
life: the South Park gang, consisting of jewish Kyle, barfing Stan, big
fat Eric Cartman, and the ever-dying Kenny, sneak into an R-rated movie
called "Asses of Fire", starring their favorite Canadian duo, Terence
and Phillip.  Upon viewing of the movie, they pick up several pieces of
profanity that they begin spewing everywhere, particularly at their
school, where trouble begins to brew.  That's when Kyle's overdefensive
mother begins a campaign called Mothers Against Canada, and it soon
brews into a war between the United States and Canada, with Terence and
Phillip held as prisoners of war, scheduled to be executed following a
big USO show with Big Gay Al.  On top of all this, if they do die, Satan
and his new lover, the impeccable Saddam Hussein (whose real head is
actually used on a figure in the movie) will take over the world.  Still
with me?
As I stated, the animation is pretty similar to what was seen on the
show.  At some points, there is some computer animation assistance, but
not to the point that you're forgetting you're watching cardboard
cutouts.  Still, everything appears as it would in the world of South
Park, and I really wouldn't have it any other way.
The script and musical numbers, however, are the real surprise here.
Trey Parker and Matt Stone, the creators of South Park, simply could've
filled the movie with obscenities and it would've sold, but they've gone
the extra mile constructing great jokes and great little music bits like
the aforementioned "Uncle F***er" and an extended, choir-backed "Kyle's
Mom Is a Big Fat Bitch".  I even picked up the soundtrack just for
kicks.  There's some great sick jokes in here, too, not to mention a
clever little nod to The Phantom Menace and Dragon Ball Z.
The voicework is also top notch.  Although most of the voices are
provided by Parker and Stone, celebrities like George Clooney (who's
more than just a gay dog in the role of a doctor), Minnie Driver (who's
humorous in her bit as Brooke Shields- yes, Brooke Shields), and Eric
Idle (as a scientist who helps install a V-chip in Eric Cartman's head
to stop his incessant cursing- he's hilarious) add icing to the cake.
Also, a nod of the hat to Marc Shaiman for helping organize the great
musical numbers.  However, did we really need Satan doing a dramatic
number?  The irony is kinda funny, but the number was flat.
There's plenty of sick, disgusting laughs throughout the movie, as it's
smarter than your average curse-fest.  Sure, it's not for kids (make
sure they go see Tarzan instead- and STAY there), but adults will have a
riot of a time if they can tolerate the language.  I know I could, but,
then again, I'm a South Park fan.  And I'm not "fat ass".
